#ThisURL#
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/Catalog/Browse.Catalog.aspx
#SubURL#
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=507101
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?ResourceID=533629&ClassID=380049
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=461021
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=461022
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?ResourceID=551863&ClassID=372781
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=461020
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?ResourceID=551863&ClassID=372780
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?ResourceID=285443&ClassID=372951
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=517158
http://lms.ulknowledgeservices.com/catalog/display.resource.aspx?resourceid=461019
http://www.ul.com/
http://www.ulknowledgeservices.com/
#Title#
UL Knowledge Solutions
#Content#
Email:   Password:      New User?  Forgot your password? Welcome Back Anonymous User   Update Profile | View Cart | Learning Plan | Learning History | Log Out    {1} ##LOC[OK]## {1} ##LOC[OK]## ##LOC[Cancel]## {1} ##LOC[OK]## ##LOC[Cancel]## Home Search Catalog Class Calendar Workshops and eLearning Regulatory Essentials Private Workshops Continuing Education Workshops - Europe Workshops - Latin America Personnel Certification Transcript Request About Us Questions / Contact Us UL.com Course Topics At UL Knowledge Solutions, our goal is to help you develop safe, useful products that meet and exceed your customers' needs. Here you'll find dozens of training courses taught by qualified instructors. UL found the following courses available for the course topic you selected:   Scheduled Public Workshops Foundations of 3D Printing Workshop & Technology Demo      7/11/2016 Fremont, CA      8/29/2016 Louisville, KY      10/3/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/31/2016 Fremont, CA      10/31/2016 Louisville, KY A full-day workshop providing introductory knowledge of the 3D printing industry and related technologies. The Technology Demo features 3D printing software, material, printers and post-processing techniques. Fundamentals of AM Designs      5/24/2016 Louisville, KY      7/12/2016 Fremont, CA      8/30/2016 Louisville, KY      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/1/2016 Fremont, CA      11/1/2016 Louisville, KY      12/5/2016 Singapore Fundamentals of AM Designs gives students a working knowledge of how to create and fix design files, identify designs that are printable, and compare traditional design activities to additive manufacturing design activities. This course will provide an introduction into how to gather requirements for AM designs, design for manufacture and assembly (DFMA) for AM, and implement DFMA in an organization. Design Strategies for AM      5/26/2016 Louisville, KY      7/14/2016 Fremont, CA      7/18/2016 Singapore      9/1/2016 Louisville, KY      10/6/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/3/2016 Louisville, KY      11/3/2016 Fremont, CA      12/7/2016 Singapore Design Strategies provides a working knowledge of how to develop, implement and optimize designs for different strategies in additive manufacturing. Through instructional design and case studies, students will learn about concurrent engineering principles, identifying the best designs for 3D Printing, optimization strategies and example simulation tools. Additive Manufacturing Economics      5/24/2016 Louisville, KY      8/2/2016 Fremont, CA      9/20/2016 Louisville, KY      10/25/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/29/2016 Fremont, CA      11/29/2016 Louisville, KY Partnering with Berenschot, a leading European consulting firm with a recognized Additive Manufacturing (AM) practice, UL’s AM Economics training teaches you how to benefit from the many advantages AM has to offer. Advanced Training on Metal Part Production      4/25/2016 Louisville, KY      5/9/2016 Louisville, KY      6/20/2016 Louisville, KY      7/18/2016 Louisville, KY      8/1/2016 Louisville, KY      9/12/2016 Louisville, KY      10/3/2016 Louisville, KY      11/14/2016 Louisville, KY      12/12/2016 Louisville, KY Offered at UL’s Additive Manufacturing Competency Center (AMCC) in Louisville, Kentucky, students will learn and apply advanced additive manufacturing with metals during this 5-day hands-on course. Beginning with process and material fundamentals and progressing through design, build planning, process parameters, post-processing and quality evaluation, students will design and manufacture parts as part of project teams. Managing Quality and Safety in AM      5/17/2016 Louisville, KY      7/20/2016 Singapore      7/26/2016 Fremont, CA      9/13/2016 Louisville, KY      9/29/2016 Singapore      10/18/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/15/2016 Louisville, KY      11/15/2016 Fremont, CA      11/16/2016 Singapore Managing Quality & Safety in AM provides students a working knowledge of process and material hazard management & how to assure quality and safety in part production. This course will provide details on how to set up an AM safety management system, identify & manage process & materials hazards, and assess conformance of parts manufactured using AM technologies, including design validation & development and validation of material and process. Selecting AM Materials and Processes      5/10/2016 Louisville, KY      5/17/2016 Singapore      6/16/2016 Singapore      7/19/2016 Fremont, CA      8/16/2016 Singapore      9/6/2016 Louisville, KY      10/12/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/18/2016 Singapore      11/8/2016 Louisville, KY      11/8/2016 Fremont, CA Selecting AM Materials and Processes provides students a working knowledge of AM process and material characteristics and how to combine AM technologies with traditional manufacturing techniques for part production. Online Courses Foundations of 3D Printing: eLearning An interactive four-module course that presents comprehensive introductory knowledge of the 3D printing industry. Covering terms and definitions, software and hardware, safety and quality considerations as well as discussing applications and case studies, you will begin to understand the benefits of 3D printing in a way that is relevant to your business needs. Scheduled Public Workshops Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      5/10/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive two-day workshop will give you the latest information on plastic materials intended for use in electrical products, plus provide extensive information about UL tests, ratings and requirements for plastics. You’ll also learn where the IEC stands with regard to plastics and how to use UL’s Plastics Directory to select the right recognized plastic materials for your products. Safety of Household and Similar Electrical Appliances; General Requirements, IEC 60335-1, 5th Edition      5/24/2016 Chicago, IL      10/18/2016 Chicago, IL Knowing how to use IEC 60335-1, 5th Edition effectively in a product's design phase is critical to its certification and acceptance within the global marketplace. This two-day technical workshop will give you in-depth exposure to essential topics such as spacing and insulation requirements, supply connections, component requirements and performance test criteria. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Commercial Electric Cooking Appliances: Designing for Compliance to UL 197 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This one-day workshop outlines the approach UL uses to investigate commercial electric cooking appliances for compliance to the construction and performance requirements of UL 197. LIMITED TIME OFFER: 100% of the tuition paid for this workshop will be credited toward any commercial electric cooking appliances UL listing certification project opened within 90 days of workshop completion*. *Some restrictions apply, see full description. Designing for Compliance to UL 60730: Automatic Electrical Controls for Household and Similar Use      4/19/2016 Chicago, IL      5/17/2016 Los Morales, Mexico City      9/21/2016 Los Morales, Mexico City      10/4/2016 Chicago, IL This two-day workshop provides participants the opportunity to learn the key points of UL 60730. Participants will also be able to identify the key differences between UL 60730 and IEC 60730 after completing the course. Household Refrigerators and Freezers: Designing for Compliance to UL 250 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. In this two-day workshop you will come away with a greater knowledge of how to design your products to the general requirements from UL 250. Introduction to Boiler Safety      5/10/2016 Raleigh, NC      8/23/2016 Raleigh, NC This course describes a typical boiler room and its components, explains the operating sequence of a boiler, and identifies the required safety controls and their function and rationale. It concludes by examining the rationale and procedures for various preventative maintenance functions for a boiler assembly. Online Courses Diagnosing HVAC Lightning and Electrical Surge Failures This self-paced online course will prepare HVAC field technicians to troubleshoot, isolate, and document HVAC failures, and accurately characterize failures that can be attributed to lightning strike or externally caused electrical surge damage. Electronically Controlled and Electronically Protected Motors: UL 1004 (On-Demand) This one-hour On-Demand webinar covers UL’s philosophy regarding safety as applied to electronically controlled and electronically protected motors. You’ll leave understanding why the requirements are what they are. UL 1004 is explained in a manner that highlights how to design safety compliance into products rather than redesign noncompliance out. ENERGY STAR® Requirements (On-Demand) This one-hour On-Demand webinar is designed to teach participants about the new requirements for the Environmental Protection Agency’s (EPA) ENERGY STAR® certification program. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Introduction to IEEE 1776(2008): Recommended Practice for Thermal Evaluation of Unsealed or Sealed Insulation Systems for AC Electric Machinery Employing Form-wound Pre-Insulated Stator Coils for machine Rated 15000 V and Below This thirty-minute eLearning presentation will give you a complete overview of form-wound insulation systems that are used at voltages exceeding 1000 V. Typical applications include wind turbine generators, motors having large frame size and horsepower ratings, and large industrial generators (greater than 1.5 megawatts.) Overview of the UL 474, UL 484, UL 1995, and UL 60335-2-40 Transition Prepare for the transition from UL 474, UL 484 and UL 1995 to the new harmonized UL 60335-2-40 Standard. The New Standard for Appliance Switches: UL 61058-1 (On-Demand Webinar) In this one-hour on-demand webinar you will learn how the internationally harmonized UL 61058-1 defines the same level of safety as UL 1054, while providing global market access. Highlights of the national differences included in the standard are covered, as are details of differences that may impact switch construction. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. UL 2158: Electric Clothes Dryer Containment Requirement This 30 minute eLearning focuses on the changes in the UL 2158 standard and will provide a road map to assist you in navigating the Fire Containment Test Process. This course will also highlight the benefits of using UL’s appliance design advisory services to help you successfully complete the Fire Containment Test. Online Courses EMV and Contactless eLearning Now that the U.S. is moving towards EMV, the need for education and knowledge around this subject is rising. UL Transaction Security experts addressed this by developing an eLearning course that suits a large audience. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Online Courses Lithium Ion Battery Safety in the Workplace This course introduces safe handling, storage, and transportation practices for lithium ion batteries. Battery and Charger Safety Batteries provide electric power for equipment like forklifts, narrow-aisle trucks, airport vehicles, electric buses, autos and golf cars. When used properly, batteries are a safe and reliable source of power. As with any power source, there are some hazards. This lesson covers these hazards, including electrical shock, corrosive chemical exposure and battery handling. Battery Safety for Telecommunications Telecommunication services depend on batteries and power plants. The chemical and electrical components of these power sources have the potential to seriously injure, or even kill, you. Fortunately, you can protect yourself from these hazards by taking the proper safety precautions. This lesson is designed to give you the information you need to stay safe on the job. Free Webinar: UL9540 for the Safety of Energy Storage Systems Join UL experts for a recorded webinar designed to introduce and explore UL9540, the new standard for safety of energy storage systems, which includes electrical, electro-chemical, mechanical and other types of energy storage technologies for systems intended to supply electrical energy. Lithium Batteries by DOT Ground Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by ground transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Lithium Batteries by IATA/ICAO Air Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by air transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Lithium Batteries by IMDG Ocean Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by ocean transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Multimodal Lithium Batteries by Air and Ground Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by air and ground transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Multimodal Lithium Batteries by Air and Ocean Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by air and ocean transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Multimodal Lithium Batteries by All Modes Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by any mode of transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. Multimodal Lithium Batteries by Ground and Ocean Dangerous Goods (Hazmat) Training for preparing or accepting shipments of lithium ion and lithium metal batteries that are being shipped by ground and ocean transport. Enables employer to certify employee according to US DOT and International Training Requirements for both Initial or Recurrent training. UL 2272 – What it Means for Hoverboards & Related Light EV Operated Products Recorded Webinar This free recorded webinar provides an overview of UL 2272 Electrical Systems for Self-Balancing Scooters. You’ll learn about UL’s certification programs for self- balancing scooters, criteria used for evaluation, and future plans for the UL 2272 standard development including reaching consensus on the standard’s requirements. UL 4200A Button Cell Batteries of Lithium & Similar Technologies This eLearning course provides an introduction to the UL4200A standard which should benefit consumers and manufacturers who employ button cell batteries in their products. It addresses safety and construction requirements in the standard and strategies for securing the battery. Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Dampers for Fire and Smoke Containment and Control – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire and smoke dampers. Fire Door – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire doors and hardware. Fire Pumps and Engines Extinguishing Systems for Special Hazard Fire Suppression - An Understanding of Testing and Certification - Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar provides a fundamental understanding of testing, performance and certification of fire pumps and engines; and clean agent extinguishing systems for special hazard fire suppression. Foam and Foam Equipment Extinguishing Systems for Special Hazard Fire Suppression - An Understanding of Testing and Certification - Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar provides a fundamental understanding of testing, performance and certification of foam and foam equipment; and clean and kitchen agent extinguishing systems for special hazard fire suppression. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. UL Certified Risk Professional (CRP) - Property: Instructor-Led Workshop      7/19/2016 Northbrook, IL      10/11/2016 Northbrook, IL This three-day in person instructor-led training allows participants the opportunity to learn how to recognize and evaluate property related risks and is recommended for people who have three to five years of experience in the industry. Understanding Air and Water Field Testing of Installed Fenestration Systems There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This 60 minute instructor-led course explores the value and importance of air and water field testing of installed fenestration systems. Learn about typical project specifications, test standards, methods and test results and potential outcomes of the test results. Online Courses Commodity Classification – A Critical Consideration in Automatic Fire Sprinkler System Design Learn how UL’s Commodity Classification testing program relates to Automatic Fire Sprinkler System Design in accordance with NFPA 13, Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems. Completion awards CEUs. Dampers for Fire and Smoke Containment and Control eLearning This course provides an introduction to UL’s Damper Certification program. Gain a general understanding of product standards, different types of dampers, applications and test requirements for each. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Protection Learn how UL’s certification of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression plays a vital role not only in protecting lives, but also protecting critical locations such as computer clean rooms, archive storages, industrial paint lines, and commercial cooking areas. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Suppression: Overview (Module 1) Gain an in-depth overview of the types of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression. This is the first module of an eLearning series. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Suppression: Testing and Evaluation (Module 2) Gain in-depth knowledge about the UL testing and evaluation for various types of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression. This is the second module of an eLearning series. Free Webinar: Introduction to UL Certified Risk Professional – Property      4/27/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the value and importance of learning and maintaining knowledge on risks associated with commercial property construction. Learn why North American building codes and standards are critical knowledge elements for anyone working in commercial building risk assessment. Free Webinar: Load Restriction Factor Changes to Full Scale Floor Assemblies This free one-hour recorded webinar for UL file owners will cover historical and current methods used to calculate and apply loads for fire resistive assemblies evaluated to UL 263. Participants will learn the definition and application load restriction factors and how they apply to UL fire resistive designs. NFPA 285 Recorded Webinar Learn the requirements within NFPA 285 for the evaluation of exterior wall systems and components. Qualified Firestop Contractor Program Online Examination The UL and ULC Qualified Firestop Contractor Program is a voluntary, third party certification of firestop installation contractor companies. The program is available in the U.S and Canada and provides architects, Authorities Having Jurisdiction (AHJs), general contractors, manufacturers, building owners and others with a way to identify qualified contractors that comply with UL's Qualified Contractor Program Requirements. Recorded Webinar: Evaluation Reports for Architect & Code-Authority Acceptance Learn how UL can assist in getting your product specified by architects and accepted by code authorities through the issuance of UL Evaluation Reports and the training for architects and code authorities. Recorded Webinar: Third Party Certifications and Evaluation Reports for Code-Compliant Installations Learn how to use free valuable tools designed to help readily demonstrate compliance with code requirements for safety and sustainability. Testing and Certification of Commercial Roofing Products Learn how UL testing, certification and evaluation services can help mitigate costs and reduce damage to commercial roofing resulting from fire, wind and hail. UL Certified Risk Professional (CRP) - Property Certificate Program The UL Certified Risk Professional – Property Certificate Program allows participants the opportunity to learn how to recognize and evaluate property related risks and is recommended for people who have three to five years of experience in the industry. Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Dampers for Fire and Smoke Containment and Control – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire and smoke dampers. Electrical Safety and Arc Flash Prevention      8/9/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Northbrook, IL In this two day workshop, you will learn the general requirements of the 2015 edition of NFPA 70E Standard for Electrical Safety in the Workplace® to guide you in setting up, creating the appropriate documentation and procedures, and following an electrical safety program for compliance with OSHA 1910 Subpart S and OSHA 1926 Subpart K. Fire Door – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire doors and hardware. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. Online Courses A Code Official's Guide to UL This self-paced, web-based training program provides code enforcers and authorities having jurisdiction with a better understanding of UL certifications and resource services that are available to help them achieve safe, code compliant installations using UL certified products. Achieving Code Compliance Using UL Fire Resistance Designs This self-paced, web-based training program provides code authorities, design professionals and contractors with information on UL fire-resistance-rated designs that can be utilized to achieve safe, code compliant installations. Analysis of Changes for the 2008 NEC This online course has been prepared with the objective of providing coverage of the major changes in the 2008 National Electrical Code. Great care has been taken to select changes that provide the best, most complete information and greatest benefit. Analysis of Changes for the NEC 2011 This 12-hour online course is designed to cover the major changes in the National Electrical Code for the 2011 cycle. This includes communications, PV, wiring methods, and the grounding of systems, services, motors, transformers, feeder branch circuits and equipment. Comprehensive Fire Protection Approach This online course is designed to improve fire safety through applying understanding of a comprehensive fire protection approach. Engineered Lumber in Fire Conditions - CEUs This two-hour presentation summarizes a research study on the hazards posed to firefighters by the use of lightweight construction and engineered lumber in floor and roof designs. Engineered Lumber in Fire Conditions Course This two-hour presentation summarizes a research study on the hazards posed to firefighters by the use of lightweight construction and engineered lumber in floor and roof designs. Fire Alarm Systems: UL Listing, Certification, Acceptance and Testing & Maintenance Fire Alarm Systems is a two-hour eLearning course that covers various aspects of alarm certification and the benefits of participating in the UL alarm certification program. The course describes the codes governing fire alarm system compliance, the benefits of certification to the monitoring company and property owner, and some common problems associated with system compliance. Fire Behavior in a Single Family Occupancy Fire tests in a furnished simulated single-family occupancy provide firefighters with pragmatic, cognitive and analytical skills for understanding fire behavior based on fire growth, spread, rate and intensity. Performance of Special Extinguishing Agents for Firefighter Use This one-hour presentation is based on a research study to evaluate the performance and effectiveness of special extinguishing agents in firefighting of residential structural fires. Residential Fire Modeling Participants will learn how boundary conditions and fire initiation affect modeling. Analysis and discussion will enable participants to evaluate and interpret fire-modeling results, and apply them to real-life fires. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. Scheduled Public Workshops Specifying Printed Wiring Boards in End-Product Applications There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The purpose of this two-day workshop is to increase your awareness of the safety issues involved with selecting laminate materials and other components for use in the construction of a printed wiring board (PWB). A series of lectures and classroom exercises have been designed to enhance your skills in selecting materials for specific end-product applications. Switchboards - Designing for Compliance to UL 891 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This one-day workshop will explore the range of UL services from product submittal to field evaluation. In addition, our expert engineers will review the entire scope and requirements that fall under UL 891 for Safety for Dead-Front Switchboards. Online Courses Printed Wiring Boards Learn how to recognize and evaluate the suitability of Printed Wiring Boards (PWBs) for their application in electrical products. Overcurrent Protection: Circuit Breakers and Fuses Gain an understanding of the use and application of circuit breakers and fuses as the primary means of overcurrent protection required by the National Electrical Code (NEC). Relays Gain an understanding of the use and application of relays as a means to control various types of current loads in end-use equipment. Polymeric Materials Gain a high-level understanding of the characteristics and structures of polymers and the corresponding test ratings and procedures. Components 101 - Overview of UL's Global Component Services This interactive online course provides you with in-depth information about how UL global component services can help customers save time to market and development costs as well as drive supply chain integrity. Scheduled Public Workshops Designing for Compliance to IEC 62368-1 2nd Edition: Transition from IEC 60950 & IEC 60065 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Prepare for a smooth transition to IEC 62368-1 and gain insight into key changes with respect to the primary legacy standards IEC 60065 and IEC 60950-1. Designing for Compliance to IEC 62368-1 2nd Edition      5/19/2016 Garden Grove, CA      6/21/2016 Fremont, CA      7/6/2016 Minneapolis, MN      9/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      10/12/2016 Raleigh, NC      12/13/2016 Fremont, CA Safety standards for high-tech products are shifting from prescriptive rules to a new hazard-based concept that emphasizes safety design in the early product development phase. Gain the expertise to effectively design to the new requirements listed in IEC 62368-1 and UL/CSA 62368 with this interactive course. ITE: Designing for Compliance to UL 60950-1 2nd Edition, CAN/CSA-C22.2 No. 60950-1-07; 2007 and IEC 60950-1 2nd edition; 2005 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This newly designed two-day workshop will review product safety of information technology and communications equipment from the technical design perspective and in the context of accessing global markets with single equipment designs. Your experienced UL instructors will cover the based content of UL 60950-1, and all notable differences between the first and more recently published second editions. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC This workshop provides detailed information on how to specify, implement and validate safety-related control systems for machinery to establish conformance with regulations and standards. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Functional Safety Training      9/14/2016 Northbrook, IL Whenever safety depends on the correctness of certain functionality, be this the flap control in an aircraft, the flame detection in a burner furnace, or the lid interlock of a washing machine, a case of “functional safety” is present. To achieve and demonstrate functional safety is particularly challenging, especially if such functionality is implemented in complex microelectronics and software. NA Global Compliance Roadshow      6/14/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/8/2016 Raleigh, NC Throughout the second half of 2015 UL will be holding a series of compliance workshops across NA. This one day event, which includes lunch, will provide an insight into some of the most current standards and directive updates that affect high tech products. Online Courses Designing for Compliance to IEC 62368-1 2nd Edition eLearning Learn the purpose and significance of IEC 62368-1 and explore the key drivers and principals of the Standard. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Hazard-based Safety Engineering (HBSE) On-Demand Webinar This on-demand webinar introduces viewers to the basic concepts of Hazard-based Safety Engineering (HBSE) and the value of using HBSE to achieve an accurate safety assessment and or inspection. Introduction to IEC 62368-1 Comparison Summary Document Part 1 The Comparison Summary Document is intended to help those interested in identifying the potential differences between IEC 62368-1 and either IEC 60065 or IEC 60950-1. This 15-minute online course focuses on how to access and utilize the Comparison Summary Document for IEC 62368-1, IEC 60950-1 and IEC 60065. Introduction to the IEC 62368-1 Comparison Summary Document Part 2 The Comparison Summary Document Part 2 is intended to identify the potential differences between IEC 62368-1 and either IEC 60950-1 or IEC 60065 from a “test equipment” perspective. Recorded Webinar on Insulation Coordination - UL 60947-1 and UL 60947-4-1A Recorded Webinar - UL Knowledge Services together with the National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA) is pleased to offer a recorded webinar on Insulation Coordination for UL 60947-1 and UL 60947-4-1A. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. UL 2272 – What it Means for Hoverboards & Related Light EV Operated Products Recorded Webinar This free recorded webinar provides an overview of UL 2272 Electrical Systems for Self-Balancing Scooters. You’ll learn about UL’s certification programs for self- balancing scooters, criteria used for evaluation, and future plans for the UL 2272 standard development including reaching consensus on the standard’s requirements. Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. FCIA Education Program      5/3/2016 Las Vegas, NV      9/20/2016 Edmonton, AB      11/8/2016 Charleston, SC Presented by the Firestop Contractors International Association (FCIA), this program provides a thorough understanding of firestop systems installation protocol and is an excellent preparatory course for the UL Qualified Firestop Contractor DRI Examination. Firestop Industry Examination      5/4/2016 Las Vegas, NV      9/20/2016 Edmonton, AB      11/8/2016 Charleston, SC The UL Qualified Firestop Contractor examination is designed to assess knowledge of the FCIA Manual of Practice, the UL Fire Resistance Directories, and the UL Qualified Firestop Contractor program requirements. The examination is a 3 hour, open book, proctored written examination. For successful completion of the examination, individuals must obtain a correct score of 80% or better. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. NFCA Education Program There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The NFCA offers a 1 day training program to prepare SFRM contractors for the UL Qualified SFRM Contractor DRI Examination. Topics include UL Directory, beam substitution, thickness adjustment, restrained versus un-restrained, UL global topics, NFCA product application guideline, NFCA application quality control procedures guideline and review of a contractor management assurance program to meet UL program requirements. Spray Applied Fire Resistive Material Examination There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The UL Qualified Spray-Applied Fire Resistive Material (SFRM) Contractor Program examination is designed to assess knowledge of the NFCA Training Manual for SFRM Contractors, the UL Fire Resistance Directories, and the UL Qualified SFRM Contractor program requirements. The examination is a 3 hour, open book, proctored written examination. Online Courses AFCI Basics Training Course This course will help electrical system installers complete the trouble-free installation of Arc-Fault Circuit-Interrupter (AFCI) circuit breakers. It also describes what they should do in the unlikely event that unwanted tripping should occur. UL’s Qualified Contractor Program: Management System Elements This one-hour self-paced course is designed to help organize and streamline your efforts in developing your management system to comply with UL’s Qualified Contractor Program Requirements. Online Courses Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Scheduled Public Workshops Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. UL Data Acceptance Program Requirements for Participation There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Gain a foundational understanding of the UL Data Acceptance Program requirements which are based on UL’s interpretation of ISO/IEC 17025. Online Courses Introduction to UL’s Data Acceptance Program eLearning Gain a high-level overview of the sub-programs that comprise UL’s Data Acceptance Program (DAP). UL ISO/IEC 17025:2005 DAP/SMT Quality Manual and Procedure Job Aid The DAP Quality Manual and Procedure Job Aid will enable and assist you on developing your own DAP quality manual. It will provide guidance on the applicable ISO17025 requirements provides examples of typical procedures. The job aid section includes a template for creating a document control procedure. Scheduled Public Workshops Electrical Safety and Arc Flash Prevention      8/9/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Northbrook, IL In this two day workshop, you will learn the general requirements of the 2015 edition of NFPA 70E Standard for Electrical Safety in the Workplace® to guide you in setting up, creating the appropriate documentation and procedures, and following an electrical safety program for compliance with OSHA 1910 Subpart S and OSHA 1926 Subpart K. National Electrical Code for Photovoltaics (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      6/7/2016 Fremont, CA      10/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This one-day seminar will provide you with and understanding of Article 690 for designing and installing photovoltaic systems in the 2014 Edition of the National Electrical Code. Online Courses National Electrical Code® (NEC) Overview A high-level overview of the National Electrical Code (NEC). The National Electrical Code® and UL Gain insight into the relationship between NEC, UL and other key certifying organizations. Navigating the National Electrical Code®: Code Arrangement Gain insight into the arrangement of the National Electrical Code® (NEC). Electric Shock Explore the hazard and mitigation techniques associated with electricity and electric shock as they relate to product safety and product design. Navigating the National Electrical Code®: General and Core Requirements Learn the general and core requirements of the National Electrical Code® (NEC). Overcurrent Protection: Circuit Breakers and Fuses Gain an understanding of the use and application of circuit breakers and fuses as the primary means of overcurrent protection required by the National Electrical Code (NEC). Electrical Insulation Understand the purpose of insulation as a means of protection from electric shock and identify the different types and uses of electrical insulation. Relays Gain an understanding of the use and application of relays as a means to control various types of current loads in end-use equipment. Revising the National Electrical Code® Gain insight into the processes involved for revising the National Electrical Code® (NEC). Enclosure Design: Product Safety Considerations Learn the key product safety considerations for enclosure design. Permanently Wired Connections Learn the where, when, and how of permanently wired connections and the corresponding requirements for product standards and installation codes. Spacings Gain essential information to help you determine whether clearance and creepage distances designed into electrical products are compliant with applicable safety requirements. Groundings and Bondings Learn the key terms and basic principles associated with grounding and bonding for safe delivery of electrical energy to products and facilities. Plug and Cord Connections Learn how to identify and define the safety requirements for plug and cord connections related to electrical equipment. Introduction to NFPA® 70E - Electrical Safety in the Workplace Learn the key aspects of NFPA® 70E as it applies to hazards associated with electrical energy during the installation, operation and maintenance of electrical equipment. Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) for Electric Shock and Arc Flash Hazards A high-level overview of the Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) required when the potential exists for exposure to electric shock and arc flash hazards. The Nature of Incident Energy and Means for Mitigating the Arc Flash Hazards Learn how incident energy is determined and how to mitigate arc flash hazards. Analysis of Changes for the 2008 NEC This online course has been prepared with the objective of providing coverage of the major changes in the 2008 National Electrical Code. Great care has been taken to select changes that provide the best, most complete information and greatest benefit. Analysis of Changes for the NEC 2011 This 12-hour online course is designed to cover the major changes in the National Electrical Code for the 2011 cycle. This includes communications, PV, wiring methods, and the grounding of systems, services, motors, transformers, feeder branch circuits and equipment. Online Courses Electric Vehicle Charging System Installation This is a 2 1/2 hour, self-paced course intended for qualified electricians who will be tasked with the end-to-end installation of residential and/or commercial Electric Vehicle Charging System (EVCS) and equipment. On-Demand Webinar: Electric Vehicle (EV) Charging Systems: Designing for Compliance to Safety and Performance Standards This complimentary 45-minute on-demand webinar provides an overview of the safety and performance requirements for Electric Vehicle (EV) Charging Systems and related components. It discusses applicable UL safety standards and additional compliance standards from the IEC, NEC, SAE and CHAdeMO. SCE's EV E-Learning Modules for Electricians This course consists of 9 training modules covering various processes, procedures and related information to help you understand how to prepare residential homes and complexes for safe and reliable electric vehicle (EV) charging. UL 2272 – What it Means for Hoverboards & Related Light EV Operated Products Recorded Webinar This free recorded webinar provides an overview of UL 2272 Electrical Systems for Self-Balancing Scooters. You’ll learn about UL’s certification programs for self- balancing scooters, criteria used for evaluation, and future plans for the UL 2272 standard development including reaching consensus on the standard’s requirements. Scheduled Public Workshops Fundamentals of Applied EMC Engineering There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This interactive two-day seminar will provide you with an understanding of the fundamental or basic aspects of Maxwell's equations (made simple in this course). A brief overview on concerns related to printed circuit board design and layout along with secondary methods to achieve EMC such as filtering, shielding and gasketing is examined. An overview on the international compliance arena is also presented along with the process one must take Grounding and Shielding for System Level Noise Reduction There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This comprehensive two-day course stresses applied Electromagnetic Compatibility (EMC) related to the design of circuits and systems and provides detailed coverage of the development, propagation and reception of unwanted RF fields both to and from the environment that the system is installed within. This course also extensively covers grounding and shielding, the two main areas of concern in the EMC field. Signal Integrity and EMC Considerations in Printed Circuit Board Design There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Developed for both experienced and junior level engineers responsible for printed circuit board designs and system level products, this highly interactive two-day workshop will provide you with hands-on techniques for the design and layout of printed circuit boards. Signal Integrity and electromagnetic compatibility (EMC) along with regulatory compliance requirements will also be examined. Scheduled Public Workshops Photovoltaic (PV) System Installation Certification Exam      4/27/2016 Melville, NY - UL      5/25/2016 Northbrook, IL      6/29/2016 Raleigh, NC To receive the PV System Installer Certification, an individual must pass one exam. The exam is intended to measure the necessary competencies for a qualified electrical professional with OSHA 30-hour safety training for construction and several years of hands-on experience in the field. UL 62109: Power Converters for Use in PV Systems This one-day course offers a bridge for manufactures familiar with UL 1741 certification to the new UL 62109 Standard. It reviews the overall scope of UL 62109 and explores the requirements which benefit photovoltaic inverter/converter manufacturers and guidance on how to efficiently transition from UL 1741 to UL 62109. Construction of and Testing for UL 1741: Inverters, Converters, Controllers and Interconnection System Equipment (Bundled Workshop) There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This two-day technical training course will provide a comprehensive overview of UL 1741. This course teaches the requirements needed to be in compliance with the NFPA 70: US National Electrode Code (NEC), which is critical to an inverters certification and acceptance in the global marketplace. Electrical Safety and Arc Flash Prevention      8/9/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Northbrook, IL In this two day workshop, you will learn the general requirements of the 2015 edition of NFPA 70E Standard for Electrical Safety in the Workplace® to guide you in setting up, creating the appropriate documentation and procedures, and following an electrical safety program for compliance with OSHA 1910 Subpart S and OSHA 1926 Subpart K. National Electrical Code for Photovoltaics (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      6/7/2016 Fremont, CA      10/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This one-day seminar will provide you with and understanding of Article 690 for designing and installing photovoltaic systems in the 2014 Edition of the National Electrical Code. Photovoltaic (PV) System Installation Training There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This is a forty-hour, instructor-led and hands-on course intended for certified electricians who will be tasked with the end-to-end installation of residential and/or commercial photovoltaic systems. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Use in Photovoltaic Module Applications There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The purpose of this two-day workshop is to increase your awareness of the safety issues involved with selecting polymeric materials used in photovoltaic applications. A series of lectures and classroom exercises have been designed to enhance your skills in selecting materials for specific functional applications. Online Courses AFCI Basics Training Course This course will help electrical system installers complete the trouble-free installation of Arc-Fault Circuit-Interrupter (AFCI) circuit breakers. It also describes what they should do in the unlikely event that unwanted tripping should occur. Analysis of Changes for the 2008 NEC This online course has been prepared with the objective of providing coverage of the major changes in the 2008 National Electrical Code. Great care has been taken to select changes that provide the best, most complete information and greatest benefit. Analysis of Changes for the NEC 2011 This 12-hour online course is designed to cover the major changes in the National Electrical Code for the 2011 cycle. This includes communications, PV, wiring methods, and the grounding of systems, services, motors, transformers, feeder branch circuits and equipment. Avoid Design Pitfalls by Streamlining Enclosure Certification - Recorded Webinar Enclosure manufacturers that optimize their design process from the beginning are able save time and money for their company. Environmental ratings, i.e. Types 1, 3R, 4, 4X, 12, 13 and IP20, IP54, IP66, IP67, and IP69, are a critical part of the design process. UL 50E and IEC 60529, respectively, define the requirements for environmental ratings required for installations. Energy Efficiency Certification Program This one-hour recorded webinar introduces UL Environment's Energy Efficiency Certification Program. The webinar will assist customers with the new and existing regulations surrounding energy efficiency in North America. Firefighter Safety and PV - CEUs Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Firefighter Safety and PV Course Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Free Webinar: UL9540 for the Safety of Energy Storage Systems Join UL experts for a recorded webinar designed to introduce and explore UL9540, the new standard for safety of energy storage systems, which includes electrical, electro-chemical, mechanical and other types of energy storage technologies for systems intended to supply electrical energy. Introduction to IEEE 1776(2008): Recommended Practice for Thermal Evaluation of Unsealed or Sealed Insulation Systems for AC Electric Machinery Employing Form-wound Pre-Insulated Stator Coils for machine Rated 15000 V and Below This thirty-minute eLearning presentation will give you a complete overview of form-wound insulation systems that are used at voltages exceeding 1000 V. Typical applications include wind turbine generators, motors having large frame size and horsepower ratings, and large industrial generators (greater than 1.5 megawatts.) On-Demand Webinar: Electric Vehicle (EV) Charging Systems: Designing for Compliance to Safety and Performance Standards This complimentary 45-minute on-demand webinar provides an overview of the safety and performance requirements for Electric Vehicle (EV) Charging Systems and related components. It discusses applicable UL safety standards and additional compliance standards from the IEC, NEC, SAE and CHAdeMO. PV NEC Article 690 Part II Requirements This self-paced, 60 minute web-based training program provides PV module manufactures, installers, authorities having jurisdiction, and design professionals with the requirements found in NEC 690, Part II Circuit Requirements, for use with flat-plate photovoltaic modules, panels, and inverter systems to achieve safe, code compliant installations. Recorded Webinar: UL 62109 - Power Converters for Use in PV Systems Discuss the scope, requirements and submittal process for the new UL/IEC 62109 standard that is derived from the existing UL 1741 standard for photovoltaic power conversion equipment. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. UL 2703, PV Rack Mounting Systems This self-paced, online training program provides photovoltaic (PV) module manufacturers, installers, authorities having jurisdiction, and design professionals with the requirements of UL Standard 2703 for mounting systems, mounting devices, clamping/retention devices and grounding and bonding lugs for use with flat-plate photovoltaic modules and panels, to achieve safe, code compliant installations. Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Dampers for Fire and Smoke Containment and Control – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire and smoke dampers. FCIA Education Program      5/3/2016 Las Vegas, NV      9/20/2016 Edmonton, AB      11/8/2016 Charleston, SC Presented by the Firestop Contractors International Association (FCIA), this program provides a thorough understanding of firestop systems installation protocol and is an excellent preparatory course for the UL Qualified Firestop Contractor DRI Examination. Fire Door – Educational Seminar There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This educational seminar will provide basic knowledge and fundamental understanding of the testing and certification requirements for fire doors and hardware. Firestop Industry Examination      5/4/2016 Las Vegas, NV      9/20/2016 Edmonton, AB      11/8/2016 Charleston, SC The UL Qualified Firestop Contractor examination is designed to assess knowledge of the FCIA Manual of Practice, the UL Fire Resistance Directories, and the UL Qualified Firestop Contractor program requirements. The examination is a 3 hour, open book, proctored written examination. For successful completion of the examination, individuals must obtain a correct score of 80% or better. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. Installation and Services for Fire Signal Receiving Centres and Systems: CAN/ULC-S561 (UL Certified Systems) There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. UL one-day workshop for safety standard CAN/ULC-S561 focuses on UL Certified fire alarm and sprinkler alarm systems operation in accordance with Standard for Installation and Services for Fire Signal Receiving Centres and Systems, CAN/ULC-S561-03, First Edition, Amendments 1 and 2, and in compliance with the NBC and NFC. Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. NFCA Education Program There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The NFCA offers a 1 day training program to prepare SFRM contractors for the UL Qualified SFRM Contractor DRI Examination. Topics include UL Directory, beam substitution, thickness adjustment, restrained versus un-restrained, UL global topics, NFCA product application guideline, NFCA application quality control procedures guideline and review of a contractor management assurance program to meet UL program requirements. Spray Applied Fire Resistive Material Examination There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The UL Qualified Spray-Applied Fire Resistive Material (SFRM) Contractor Program examination is designed to assess knowledge of the NFCA Training Manual for SFRM Contractors, the UL Fire Resistance Directories, and the UL Qualified SFRM Contractor program requirements. The examination is a 3 hour, open book, proctored written examination. Online Courses A Code Official's Guide to UL This self-paced, web-based training program provides code enforcers and authorities having jurisdiction with a better understanding of UL certifications and resource services that are available to help them achieve safe, code compliant installations using UL certified products. Achieving Code Compliance Using UL Fire Resistance Designs This self-paced, web-based training program provides code authorities, design professionals and contractors with information on UL fire-resistance-rated designs that can be utilized to achieve safe, code compliant installations. Basement Fires - CEUs This project was a collaboration of several research organizations, product manufacturers and fire service representatives to examine hazards associated with residential flooring systems to improve firefighter safety. Several experiments were conducted to expand the body of knowledge on the impact of fire on residential flooring systems. Basement Fires Course This project was a collaboration of several research organizations, product manufacturers and fire service representatives to examine hazards associated with residential flooring systems to improve firefighter safety. Several experiments were conducted to expand the body of knowledge on the impact of fire on residential flooring systems. Comprehensive Fire Protection Approach This online course is designed to improve fire safety through applying understanding of a comprehensive fire protection approach. Engineered Lumber in Fire Conditions - CEUs This two-hour presentation summarizes a research study on the hazards posed to firefighters by the use of lightweight construction and engineered lumber in floor and roof designs. Engineered Lumber in Fire Conditions Course This two-hour presentation summarizes a research study on the hazards posed to firefighters by the use of lightweight construction and engineered lumber in floor and roof designs. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Protection Learn how UL’s certification of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression plays a vital role not only in protecting lives, but also protecting critical locations such as computer clean rooms, archive storages, industrial paint lines, and commercial cooking areas. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Suppression: Overview (Module 1) Gain an in-depth overview of the types of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression. This is the first module of an eLearning series. Extinguishing Systems Used for Special Hazard Fire Suppression: Testing and Evaluation (Module 2) Gain in-depth knowledge about the UL testing and evaluation for various types of extinguishing systems used for special hazard fire suppression. This is the second module of an eLearning series. Fire Alarm Systems: UL Listing, Certification, Acceptance and Testing & Maintenance Fire Alarm Systems is a two-hour eLearning course that covers various aspects of alarm certification and the benefits of participating in the UL alarm certification program. The course describes the codes governing fire alarm system compliance, the benefits of certification to the monitoring company and property owner, and some common problems associated with system compliance. Fire Behavior in a Single Family Occupancy Fire tests in a furnished simulated single-family occupancy provide firefighters with pragmatic, cognitive and analytical skills for understanding fire behavior based on fire growth, spread, rate and intensity. Fire Equipment Safety (Bundle): Inspection of Aerial Units This program provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. The course is comprised of four individual modules that cover: visual inspection of aerial components and structural members, critical bolt inspection and torquing, aerial hydraulic systems, and operational tests and load tests. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 1): Visual Inspection of Aerial Components and Structural Members This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the requirements for visual inspection, such as test methods, testing frequency, tools required to conduct tests, and inspection personnel qualifications. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 2): Critical Bolt Inspection and Torquing for Aerial Devices This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements for critical fasteners found under Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the inspection requirements for critical fasteners such as inspection frequency, required tools, critical fastener location and how to ensure that fasteners are properly fitted and torqued. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 3): Aerial Hydraulic Systems This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the inspection requirements for hydraulic systems on aerial units such as where they are located, how they operate, inspection frequency and tools, and how to ensure that they are working properly. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 4): Aerial Operational Tests and Load Test This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the requirements for operational tests and load test of aerial device units such as test frequency, required tools, safety considerations, and qualifications of inspection personnel. Firefighter Safety and PV - CEUs Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Firefighter Safety and PV Course Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Impact of Horizontal Ventilation - CEUs Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program, UL examined fire service ventilation practices as well as the impact of changes in modern house geometries. This online firefighter training program details the results of these experiments to provide knowledge the fire service can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Impact of Horizontal Ventilation Course Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program, UL examined fire service ventilation practices as well as the impact of changes in modern house geometries. This online firefighter training program details the results of these experiments to provide knowledge the fire service can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Performance of Special Extinguishing Agents for Firefighter Use This one-hour presentation is based on a research study to evaluate the performance and effectiveness of special extinguishing agents in firefighting of residential structural fires. Qualified Firestop Contractor Program Online Examination The UL and ULC Qualified Firestop Contractor Program is a voluntary, third party certification of firestop installation contractor companies. The program is available in the U.S and Canada and provides architects, Authorities Having Jurisdiction (AHJs), general contractors, manufacturers, building owners and others with a way to identify qualified contractors that comply with UL's Qualified Contractor Program Requirements. Residential Fire Modeling Participants will learn how boundary conditions and fire initiation affect modeling. Analysis and discussion will enable participants to evaluate and interpret fire-modeling results, and apply them to real-life fires. UL 28 Fire Laboratory Safety This web based training course provides an overview of the hazards present in the UL fire laboratory, which have hazards different from anything normally encountered at a work site. Contractors and customers who successfully complete this training course may work in the fire lab unescorted Scheduled Public Workshops Brand Protection Training Solutions UL Knowledge Services Brand Protection Training Solutions assist rights holders to implement brand protection strategies that will help protect your intellectual property. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      10/19/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive one-day workshop will provide the latest information on UL’s two main label programs: Marking & Labeling Systems and Authorized Label Supplier. Online Courses Understanding and Using the UL White Book An introduction to the UL White Book and its use to determine compliance with the National Electrical Code (NEC). Introduction to UL This module provides an introduction to UL and its history. It also covers the types of certifications available and provides a high-level overview of the project submission process. Components 101 - Overview of UL's Global Component Services This interactive online course provides you with in-depth information about how UL global component services can help customers save time to market and development costs as well as drive supply chain integrity. How to Design a UL Label An overview of how to design a UL Mark label, including the different types of UL marks, elements of the mark, where to get information for different types of products, how to get the mark printed, and the UL artwork approval process. Recorded Webinar: What Third Party Certification Can Do For You In Today's Sustainability Marketplace Recorded Webinar - This one-hour webinar introduces UL Environment and its capstone services: Environmental Claims Validation, Sustainable Product Certification and Energy Efficiency Certification. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. UL 101: Getting the UL Mark This complimentary thirty-minute on-demand webinar narrated by Keith Mowry, Manager, Accreditation Services for UL, addresses the most common questions customers ask when submitting their product(s) to obtain the UL Mark in the United States and Canada. UL 28 Fire Laboratory Safety This web based training course provides an overview of the hazards present in the UL fire laboratory, which have hazards different from anything normally encountered at a work site. Contractors and customers who successfully complete this training course may work in the fire lab unescorted Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. NA Global Compliance Roadshow      6/14/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/8/2016 Raleigh, NC Throughout the second half of 2015 UL will be holding a series of compliance workshops across NA. This one day event, which includes lunch, will provide an insight into some of the most current standards and directive updates that affect high tech products. Online Courses Understanding the ENERGY STAR® Program Gain an understanding of how the ENERGY STAR® Program promotes energy efficiency across the globe and learn how to join, qualify products and about the program’s future goals for international harmonization. Conflict Minerals and the Dodd-Frank Act A high-level overview of the Dodd-Frank Act, its background and impact on companies that use conflict minerals in the manufacturing of their products is provided in this course. Introduction to the REACH Directive Gain a high-level overview of the European Chemical Legislation REACH, an integrated system for the registration, evaluation, authorization and restriction of chemicals. Introduction to the RoHS Directive Explore the European Union’s (EU) Restriction of the Use of Certain Hazardous Substances in Electrical and Electronic Equipment (RoHS) Directive and learn the key requirements for manufacturers, distributors, and importers. US Product Safety System: CPSC v. OSHA Gain an understanding of the US product safety system with a particular focus on the regulatory jurisdictions of the Consumer Product Safety Commission and Occupational Safety and Health Administration. Introduction to the WEEE Directive An examination of the Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment (WEEE) Directive including general information, specific requirements, global impacts and strategies for compliance. Compliance Fundamentals for Global Market Access Learn the importance of international compliance and its impact on global market access. Global Compliance Strategy A high-level overview of effective global compliance strategy and how it can improve product acceptance in international markets. Product Safety Requirements for Argentina Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Argentina and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Brazil Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into Brazil and learn the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for China Market Access Learn about key compliance requirements for market entry into China including the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Europe Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Europe and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for India Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into India and learn the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Japan Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Japan and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Korea Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Korea and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Mexico Market Access Gain insight into the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Mexico and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Russia, Belarus and Kazakhstan Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into Russia, Belarus, and Kazakhstan and learn the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Saudi Arabia Market Access Learn the compliance requirements for market entry into Saudi Arabia and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Scheduled Public Workshops Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings & UL 698A 3rd Edition, Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations - Bundled Workshop      4/26/2016 Northbrook, IL      5/24/2016 Oklahoma City, OK      6/14/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      7/20/2016 Camas, WA      8/23/2016 Tulsa, OK      9/13/2016 Dallas, TX      10/18/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/18/2016 Wichita, KS This comprehensive two day workshop provides technical information to industrial control panel professionals. The workshop is ideal for those who need to understand the requirements of the UL 508A Standard for industrial control panels, as well as the new requirements found in the National Electrical Code (NEC) Article 409 and UL 508A Supplement B, and how to construct industrial control panels for use in hazard locations per UL 698A. Electrical Safety and Arc Flash Prevention      8/9/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Northbrook, IL In this two day workshop, you will learn the general requirements of the 2015 edition of NFPA 70E Standard for Electrical Safety in the Workplace® to guide you in setting up, creating the appropriate documentation and procedures, and following an electrical safety program for compliance with OSHA 1910 Subpart S and OSHA 1926 Subpart K. Hazardous Locations - Basics of Global Hazardous Locations Requirements      5/17/2016 Northbrook, IL      6/16/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      9/27/2016 Northbrook, IL In this comprehensive one-day workshop you will learn the terminology associated with hazardous locations, compare the Division and Zone classification systems, and learn the basic concepts of each method used to protect equipment in hazardous locations. You will learn hazardous locations certification markings and how to work with third party agencies to obtain certification. Hazardous Locations Bundle      5/17/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This comprehensive package bundles our three most popular and informative hazardous locations programs into a single registration. This 3 day program includes all content and materials from our Hazardous Locations – Basics of Global Hazardous Locations Requirements; our Hazardous Locations – Global Market Access ATEX Directives, IECEx, and Beyond, and our Hazardous Locations – Intrinsic Safety Design Fundamentals programs. Hazardous Locations Intrinsic Safety Design Fundamentals      5/19/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/29/2016 Northbrook, IL In this comprehensive one-day workshop you will learn about the latest requirements for intrinsically safe electrical products for hazardous locations (explosive atmospheres) applications. Hazardous Locations: Global Market Access - ATEX Directive IECEx, and Beyond      5/18/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/28/2016 Northbrook, IL In this one-day workshop, you will learn about the requirements for certifying Hazardous Locations (potentially explosive atmospheres) equipment for Europe, the IECEx System, and other critical markets and systems. Hazardous Locations: Rebuilt Motors and Generators to UL Requirements      6/15/2016 Raleigh, NC      9/13/2016 Jacksonville, FL      10/19/2016 Fargo, North Dakota This one-day workshop covers requirements for electric motors and generators for their use in hazardous (classified) locations in accordance with the National Electrical Code, NFPA 70. UL 698A 3rd Edition, Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations      4/27/2016 Northbrook, IL      5/25/2016 Oklahoma City, OK      6/15/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      7/21/2016 Camas, WA      8/24/2016 Tulsa, OK      9/14/2016 Dallas, TX      10/19/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/19/2016 Wichita, KS This comprehensive half-day workshop focuses on how to construct general use industrial control panels for use in hazardous locations in accordance with the UL 698A Third Edition Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations. UL Hazardous Locations Luminaire and Luminaire Fittings Certification to UL 844      10/26/2016 Northbrook, IL In this comprehensive one-day workshop, you will learn about the latest requirements in UL 844, the Standard for safety of luminaires and luminaire fittings for hazardous (classified) locations. Online Courses The ATEX Directive for Hazardous Locations A high-level introduction to the European Standards listed in the ATEX Directive for Hazardous Locations. Introduction to Functional Safety Learn the basic elements of functional safety and gain the knowledge needed to apply relevant standards effectively. Designing for Intrinsic Safety An overview of intrinsic safety concepts and exploration of the requirements for intrinsic safety as outlined in IEC 60079-11. Introduction to Hazardous Locations Gain a high-level understanding of the world of Hazardous locations and learn how areas are identified, classified and controlled. Scheduled Public Workshops Designing for Compliance to IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition      5/11/2016 Plano, TX - UL      7/20/2016 Minneapolis, MN      9/14/2016 Boston, MA Gain an in-depth understanding of the international IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition standard and learn the key concepts, clauses and associated annexes. Meeting Risk Management Compliance Expectations for the 3rd Edition of IEC 60601-1 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This one-day workshop provides medical device manufacturers with an overview of the risk management elements in IEC 60601 3rd edition and hands-on practice in documenting required ISO 14971 Risk Management file elements. Software Compliance for PEMS in IEC 60601 3rd Edition There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This two-day workshop will help you gain an understanding of the design and certification implications of IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition Clause 14 for Programmable Electrical Medical Systems. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/3/2016 Dallas, TX      7/12/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/11/2016 Princeton, NJ This three-day course provides a thorough understanding of how to effectively design for compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition. The content and activities covered in this course will help you gain practical skills and enhance your technical understanding of the standard. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC This workshop provides detailed information on how to specify, implement and validate safety-related control systems for machinery to establish conformance with regulations and standards. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      5/10/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive two-day workshop will give you the latest information on plastic materials intended for use in electrical products, plus provide extensive information about UL tests, ratings and requirements for plastics. You’ll also learn where the IEC stands with regard to plastics and how to use UL’s Plastics Directory to select the right recognized plastic materials for your products. The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Functional Safety Training      9/14/2016 Northbrook, IL Whenever safety depends on the correctness of certain functionality, be this the flap control in an aircraft, the flame detection in a burner furnace, or the lid interlock of a washing machine, a case of “functional safety” is present. To achieve and demonstrate functional safety is particularly challenging, especially if such functionality is implemented in complex microelectronics and software. Implementing Design Control Requirements and Best Practices      5/16/2016 Boston, MA      6/6/2016 Edison, NJ      6/20/2016 Indianapolis, IN      7/11/2016 Chicago, IL      8/8/2016 San Diego, CA      8/15/2016 Boston, MA      9/19/2016 Edison, NJ      9/26/2016       10/17/2016 Chicago, IL      10/31/2016 San Diego, CA Make sure your design process is compliant so you can avoid costly deviations. Internal Auditor Training for ISO 13485      6/6/2016 Chicago, IL      6/20/2016 Boston, MA      7/25/2016 San Diego, CA      9/12/2016 Edison, NJ      10/24/2016 Chicago, IL      11/14/2016 Boston, MA Learn the steps to develop, implement, and audit an internal quality system that efficiently and effectively meets the requirements of ISO 13485:2003 and ISO 9001:2000. Lead Auditor Training for ISO 13485      4/18/2016 Raleigh, NC      5/2/2016 Chicago, IL      5/9/2016 San Francisco, CA      5/16/2016 Edison, NJ      5/23/2016 Indianapolis, IN      6/6/2016 Austin, TX      6/6/2016 Irvine, CA      6/13/2016 Boston, MA      6/20/2016 Denver, CO      6/27/2016 San Diego, CA      7/11/2016 Minneapolis, MN      7/18/2016 Chicago, IL      7/18/2016 Orlando, FL      8/8/2016 San Francisco, CA      8/15/2016 Edison, NJ      8/29/2016 Indianapolis, IN      9/19/2016 Austin, TX      9/19/2016 Salt Lake City, UT      9/26/2016 Boston, MA      10/3/2016 San Diego, CA Learn how to assess compliance with ISO 9001:2000 and ISO 13485:2003 from the industry experts. Based on our ISO 9001:2000 RABQSA-certified IATCA QMS lead auditor training course, this interactive course covers the ISO 13485:2003 and ISO 9001:2000 requirements for quality management systems. Process Validation Principles and Protocols      4/25/2016 Chicago, IL      5/9/2016 San Diego, CA      5/23/2016 Indianapolis, IN      5/23/2016 Orlando, FL      6/27/2016 Edison, NJ      7/11/2016 San Diego, CA      9/12/2016 Boston, MA      9/26/2016 Chicago, IL      10/10/2016 Boston, MA      10/24/2016 San Diego, CA      11/7/2016 Edison, NJ      11/14/2016 San Diego, CA      12/5/2016 Indianapolis, IN      12/12/2016 Orlando, FL Using careful reviews of requirements from ISO 9001:2000, ISO 13485 and QSR along with case studies and in-class activities, learn the fundamentals and principles of process validation. Risk Management for Medical Devices: Compliance with ISO 14971      5/11/2016 Boston, MA      7/27/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/19/2016 Austin, TX This workshop is intended to teach the principles and concepts of risk management as defined in ISO 14971. Online Courses Designing for Compliance to IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition eLearning Gain a foundational understanding of IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition and explore the overall structure and general concepts outlined in the standard. The Role of IEC 60601 Around the World Gain a high-level understanding of how the IEC 60601 series and the IECEE CB Scheme are used to demonstrate compliance with regulatory requirements worldwide. Structure of IEC 60601 Gain an understanding of the nomenclature and structure around the 60601 series and explore the relationships of the general standard to collateral standards, particular standards, amendments and national deviations. General Overview and Philosophy of IEC 60601 Build a foundational understanding of how the IEC 60601-1 standard mitigates shock, mechanical, radiation, fire and other hazards and learn how the risk of each of the identified hazards is determined and reduced.. Scope of Standard & Equipment Classification Learn how to easily identify the equipment covered under the IEC 60601-1 standard and how to evaluate equipment based on the classifications found in Clause 6. Introduction to Risk Management Understand the role ISO 14971 plays within the IEC 60601 standards to demonstrate compliance with risk management requirements worldwide, including its use in the CB Scheme Test Report Form in order to document compliance. Markings and Accompanying Documents Gain an understanding of the requirements of Clause 7 within IEC 60601-1 for markings, which address durability and legibility, markings on the outside of the equipment, markings on the inside of the equipment, markings of controls, safety signs, symbols, color of insulation, and indicator lights and controls. An Overview of the FDA 510(k) Submission Process This course presents an overview of the FDA 510(k) submission process as well as the types of 510(k)s available. Bringing Wireless RF Technology to Medical Devices (On-Demand Webinar) This 70 minute on-demand webinar is designed to help Medical equipment manufacturers understand the Radio and EMC approval process for medical devices and associated equipment. Participants will also be provided with an overview of the International Market Access requirements, including common approaches for the EU, North America and other key countries includuing Brazil, China, Japan and South Africa. Choices - IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition and Component Selection Webinar This self-paced, webinar provides a high-level overview of the medical device standard IEC 60601 the 3rd edition and the choices manufacturers make as they perform component selection in the devices that they manufacture. Components 101 - Overview of UL's Global Component Services This interactive online course provides you with in-depth information about how UL global component services can help customers save time to market and development costs as well as drive supply chain integrity. European Strategies for the Evaluation of Clinical Safety and Effectiveness of Medical Devices This on-demand e-learning course will provide an overview of the European strategies of clinical safety and effectiveness of medical devices as defined in the following standards: Clinical Evaluation (MEDDEV 2.7.1), Clinical Investigation (EN ISO 14155), and Post Marketing Clinical Follow-up (MEDDEV 2.12-1). Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. IEC 60601-1 3rd Edition: Overview and Adoption Update (On-Demand Webinar) This one-hour on-demand webinar provides an overview of the changes between the 2nd edition of IEC 60601-1 and the 3rd Edition of IEC 60601-1 along with an update on the global regulatory adoption schedule. IEC 60601-1: Managing the Transition (On-Demand Webinar) UL Health Sciences subject matter experts gathered to present timely topics on the transition to IEC 60601-1 3rd edition. This series of presentations, titled: "60601 - Managing the Transition" is designed to support manufacturers of electromedical devices as you transition from IEC/UL 60601 2nd Edition to IEC 60601 3rd Edition. Introduction to Risk Management for Medical Devices Pursuant to EN ISO 14971:2009 This half hour e-learning will provide an overview of risk management for medical devices and the requirements of EN ISO 1497. Key Strategies needed for Biocompatibility for Global Market Access This on-demand e-learning course will familiarize medical device design engineers with the biocompatibility requirements defined in EN ISO 10993-1. Major Changes in IEC 61010: 3rd Edition (On-Demand Webinar) This 90-minute, on-demand webinar presented by the top UL expert in the IEC 61010 standard, a key member of the IEC standard Technical Committee (TC) 66 and also a member of the Working Group that is currently writing the US version of the standard. This webinar will provide an overview of the major changes based on the issuance of IEC 61010 3rd Edition including the incorporation of Risk Management. Major Changes to the Medical Devices Directive 93/42/EEC as Amended by 2007/47/EC (On-Demand Webinar) This one-hour on-demand webinar is intended to provide an overview of the major changes to the Medical Devices Directive 93/42/EEC as amended by 2007/47/EC, which is mandatory March 21, 2010. On-Demand Webinar: Software Compliance for PEMS in IEC 60601 3rd Edition and Beyond This complimentary 45-minute on-demand webinar provides an overview of emerging requirements for software and programmable systems, specifically highlighting three common “pain points” of software certification; software of unknown provenance, risk management for software, and legacy devices. Overview of INMETRO Certification for Medical Devices in Brazil (On-Demand Webinar) This one-hour recorded webinar reviews the requirements for market approval of medical products in Brazil. The instructor discussed the INMETRO certification process for medical devices, ANVISA registration (including 2010 new requirements by ANVISA for all medical devices) and how to integrate your INMETRO certification into your global launch plan. Regulatory Overview and Strategic Approach to Accessing and Succeeding in Key Latin American Medical Device Markets (On-Demand Webinar) This one-hour on-demand webinar will give participants an in-depth exposure to the medical device market regulations for Latin America. The Changing Regulatory Landscape for In Vitro Diagnostics The purpose of this webinar is to highlight significant changes taking place in the In Vitro Diagnostics (IVD) regulatory world over the next 2 to 3 years. This seminar provides a preview of these changes to help customers consider how these changes might impact their business. The National Differences Between UL 61010-1, UL 61010-2-030 and the IEC 61010-1 Standards This webinar will increase your understanding of the national differences between UL 61010-1, UL 61010-2-030 and the IEC 61010-1 standards. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Certified Risk Professional (CRP) - Property: Instructor-Led Workshop      7/19/2016 Northbrook, IL      10/11/2016 Northbrook, IL This three-day in person instructor-led training allows participants the opportunity to learn how to recognize and evaluate property related risks and is recommended for people who have three to five years of experience in the industry. Online Courses Free Webinar: Introduction to UL Certified Risk Professional – Property      4/27/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the value and importance of learning and maintaining knowledge on risks associated with commercial property construction. Learn why North American building codes and standards are critical knowledge elements for anyone working in commercial building risk assessment. UL Certified Risk Professional (CRP) - Property Certificate Program The UL Certified Risk Professional – Property Certificate Program allows participants the opportunity to learn how to recognize and evaluate property related risks and is recommended for people who have three to five years of experience in the industry. Scheduled Public Workshops Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC This workshop provides detailed information on how to specify, implement and validate safety-related control systems for machinery to establish conformance with regulations and standards. Automotive Functional Safety in Compliance with ISO 26262:2011      9/27/2016 Detroit, MI With the rising role of electronics in multiple systems and sub-systems within an automobile, functional safety has increasingly become a critical aspect of the overall automobile product design and development. Learn from the experts at UL on Functional Safety. This interactive three day workshop focuses on the requirements of ISO 26262:2001 Road Vehicles – Functional Safety and prepares you to meet the challenges for compliance. Internal Auditor Training for ISO 9001      5/3/2016 Edison, NJ      8/23/2016 Los Angeles, CA      10/18/2016 Orlando, FL Learn the steps to develop, implement, and evaluate an internal audit system that meets the requirements of ISO 9001 and the needs of your organization. Lead Auditor Training for ISO 9001      4/25/2016 Dallas, TX      6/6/2016 Orlando, FL      7/11/2016 Edison, NJ      9/12/2016 Chicago, IL      10/10/2016 Dallas, TX      12/12/2016 Orlando, FL Learn how to assess compliance with ISO 9001 from the industry experts. STAT-A-MATRIX has been training lead auditors longer than any other training organization in the world. This course, presented largerly through hands-on workshops, teaches you the skills you need to plan, conduct and follow up on ISO 9001 compliance skills. Risk Management for ISO 9001:2015      6/8/2016 Boston, MA      6/15/2016 Chicago, IL      7/20/2016 Edison, NJ      8/24/2016 Los Angeles, CA      9/28/2016 Dallas, TX      10/26/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/16/2016 Indianapolis, IN      12/14/2016 Boston, MA Learn how to manage a process associated with the identification, analysis, evaluation, and control of different types of risk before production begins. Transition to ISO 9001:2015      5/2/2016 Indianapolis, IN      6/6/2016 Boston, MA      7/18/2016 Edison, NJ      8/22/2016 Los Angeles, CA      9/26/2016 Dallas, TX      10/24/2016 Raleigh, NC      11/14/2016 Indianapolis, IN      12/12/2016 Boston, MA Learn the fundamental changes introduced in the new standard and recognize the opportunity to make quality management a strategic function within your organization, with measurable impact on overall performance. Online Courses FMEA Training Comprehensive online failure mode and effects analysis (FMEA) training. Includes step-by-step instructions on both design and process (DFMEA and PFMEA) FMEAs. Fundamentals of APQP This course provides an overview of the basic concepts of Mistake-Proofing. Introduction to FMEAs This course provides an introduction to FMEAs (Failure Modes and Effects Analysis). Introduction to Mistake-Proofing This course provides an overview of the basic concepts of Mistake-Proofing. Introduction to the 5S’s This introductory course is intended to familiarize managers, supervisors and employees to the concepts and techniques of the 5Ss. ISO 50001 Energy Management System (EnMS) Standard – Practitioners Guide to Implementation (On-Demand) This On-Demand webinar provides an overview of the emerging standard for energy management, its implications to overall facility’s energy operations, use, consumption and costs. The session will also address the similarities and differences to ISO 14001 (Environmental) and ISO 9001 (Quality) standards. Mapping Office Workflows Mapping Office Workflows helps office workers create visual representations of processes that they work in and provides them with tools that help unveil different aspects of their workflow and see the processes they work in from different angles. Overview of APQP The Overview of APQP course is a short course intended to explain the basic approach and scope of the Advanced Product and Quality Planning (APQP) methodology. Overview of Root Cause Analysis This self-paced, web-based training program provides learners with an overview of root cause analysis methodology and techniques. The learners will gain an appreciation for the need to identify the root cause to prevent problems from recurring and be introduced to a four step approach for addressing root causes. Common barriers to effectively deal with root causes are explored; solutions to those barriers are suggested. Quality Improvement Fundamentals Quality Improvement Fundamentals provides a foundation for understanding and applying basic quality improvement tools to understand problems and develop permanent solutions. Root Cause Analysis with Corrective Action This self-paced, web-based training program provides learners with a solid foundation in root cause analysis methodology and techniques. The learners will gain an appreciation for the need to identify the root cause to prevent problems from recurring and will be versed in a four step approach to address root causes. Common barriers to effectively deal with root causes are explored; solutions to those barriers are suggested. The 5S's Workplace Organization Comprehensive online 5s workplace organization training. Includes specific step-by-step instructions on each of the five s’s along with many practical examples. Understanding Variation A primer in statistics used for SPC (Statistical Process Control); topics covered include building and using a histogram to understand variation, patterns of variation, measures of variation (mean, range, standard deviation), the normal curve and process stability. Value Stream Mapping Learn how to map a value stream and develop a current state map for use as the basis for an improved future state map. Scheduled Public Workshops Shingo Discover Excellence - DISCOVER There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Our foundational, two-day workshop that introduces the Shingo Model™, the Guiding Principles and the Three Insights to Enterprise Excellence™. With real-time discussions and on-site learning at a host organization, this program is a highly interactive experience. It is designed to make your learning meaningful and immediately applicable as you learn how to release the latent potential in your organization and achieve enterprise excellence. Shingo Cultural Enablers - ENABLE There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. ENABLE builds upon the knowledge and experience gained at the DISCOVER EXCELLENCE workshop and takes you deeper into the Shingo Model™ by focusing on the principles identified as Cultural Enablers. Shingo Continuous Improvement - IMPROVE There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Continuous improvement begins by clearly defining value through the eyes of customers. IMPROVE continues the discussion around ideal behaviors, fundamental beliefs and behavioral benchmarks as they relate to the principles of Continuous Improvement. Shingo Enterprise Alignment - ALIGN There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. To succeed, organizations must develop management systems that align work and behaviors with principles and direction in ways that are simple, comprehensive, actionable and standardized. The sum of individual efforts rarely approximates the effective alignment of the pieces into a single integrated whole. Six Sigma Black Belt with Lean Tools Workshop and Certification There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Six Sigma Black Belts lead and manage complex projects that are focused on strategic and meaningful change.  This requires an understanding of a broad range of topics and tools that underlie successful change efforts.  This Six Sigma certification workshop provides Black Belts with the skills, the knowledge and the practical experience they will need to get results.  Six Sigma Green Belt Workshop with Lean Tools and Certification There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This Green Belt with Lean Tools workshop will enable participants to lead and contribute to quality and waste reduction improvement team projects. Participants will learn how to use the tools and templates of Six Sigma in a dynamic and active training environment. ThedaCare Lean Study Tour There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Through a partnership with the ThedaCare Center for Healthcare Value (Appleton, WI), UL facilitates access to learning firsthand from ThedaCare, a hospital system which exemplifies the 3 tenets. We are excited to invite a small group of senior leaders to participate in this educational session to observe a culture of continuous improvement in healthcare! Online Courses Lean Six Sigma Foundations This course provides the participants the opportunity to learn about the Six Sigma methodology and its by-product “Lean Six Sigma.” The course moves on to focus on the fundamental principles, key tools and core methodologies of Lean Six Sigma. Scheduled Public Workshops The CE Marking: Strategies for European Compliance      8/30/2016 Northbrook, IL This two-day workshop is designed to give you essential information about the European regulatory system and step-by-step instructions on how to develop a compliance strategy fit for your needs. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Fire Alarm Control Systems: Designing Compliance to UL 864 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This two-day workshop of control unit and accessories for fire alarm systems UL 864 will focus on the construction, operation requirements and efficacy testing of fire alarm units and systems. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance      6/8/2016 Northbrook, IL      11/16/2016 Raleigh, NC Spend two days with UL to learn how to identify and comply with product regulations in your key international markets, and then leverage the similarities and differences among those markets to develop a compliance strategy. Installation and Classification of Burglar Alarm Systems for Financial and Commercial Premises, Safes and Vaults: CAN/ULC-S302 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. Half-day ULworkshop for safety standard CAN/ULC-S302 focuses on teaching new and existing customers the requirements for building and operating a UL listed monitoring station. Laboratory Technician Essentials: A Practitioner’s Guide to the Laboratory Environment. There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This course provides a three day intensive hands-on learning experience which focuses on gaining a full understanding of the responsibilities of a laboratory technician in a testing environment and how to conduct a systematic laboratory testing process. Signal Receiving Centre Burglar Alarm Systems and Operations - CAN/ULC-S301-09 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. A half-day workshop teaching new and existing listees, monitoring station personnel, alarm installation companies, property management employees and insurance underwriters the requirements of building and operating a ULC listed monitoring station in accordance with Standard CAN/ULC-S301-09. Understanding Changes to UL & ULC Smoke Alarm and Detector Requirements There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This three-day instructor led workshop provides an understanding of the changes to UL and ULC standards related to the testing, performance and certification of smoke alarms and detector requirements. Online Courses Alarms: Designing for Compliance to UL 2050 - Request Access This 45 minute self-paced course covers the fundamental service requirements of UL2050 ‘National Industrial Security Systems’. The course material includes the monitoring, protection service, transmission methods and alarm system installations. The objective of this module is to provide a basic understanding of all the service requirements for national industrial security systems. Alarms: Designing for Compliance to UL 681 This one hour eLearning module covers the fundamental installation and service requirements of UL 681 ‘Installation and Classification of Burglar and Holdup Alarm Systems.’ Benefits of Becoming a UL Listed Fire Alarm Company This one-hour self-paced e-Learning course is designed for fire alarm companies. This course will teach participants about the benefits of obtaining a UL listing and will introduce them to the each step necessary to become UL listed. Fire Equipment Safety (Bundle): Inspection of Aerial Units This program provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. The course is comprised of four individual modules that cover: visual inspection of aerial components and structural members, critical bolt inspection and torquing, aerial hydraulic systems, and operational tests and load tests. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 1): Visual Inspection of Aerial Components and Structural Members This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the requirements for visual inspection, such as test methods, testing frequency, tools required to conduct tests, and inspection personnel qualifications. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 2): Critical Bolt Inspection and Torquing for Aerial Devices This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements for critical fasteners found under Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the inspection requirements for critical fasteners such as inspection frequency, required tools, critical fastener location and how to ensure that fasteners are properly fitted and torqued. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 3): Aerial Hydraulic Systems This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the inspection requirements for hydraulic systems on aerial units such as where they are located, how they operate, inspection frequency and tools, and how to ensure that they are working properly. Fire Equipment Safety (Module 4): Aerial Operational Tests and Load Test This module provides an overview of the inspection and testing requirements found in Chapter 19 of the NFPA 1911 standard for the Inspection and Maintenance of In-Service Automotive Fire Apparatus. Gain an understanding of the requirements for operational tests and load test of aerial device units such as test frequency, required tools, safety considerations, and qualifications of inspection personnel. Firefighter Safety and PV - CEUs Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Firefighter Safety and PV Course Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program - Fire Prevention and Safety Grants, UL examined fire service concerns regarding photovoltaic (PV) systems and the potential impact on firefighting operations. The results of these experiments provide knowledge the fire service industry can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Free Webinar: Performance Testing of Fire Department Aerial Devices      5/4/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free one-hour live webinar will educate fire departments and personnel responsible for in-service maintenance and inspection of aerial devices. Participants will gain a foundational overview of the requirements found in Chapter 19 of NFPA 1911, Standard for the Inspection, Maintenance, Testing and Retirement of In-Service Fire Apparatus, 2012 Edition. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Impact of Horizontal Ventilation - CEUs Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program, UL examined fire service ventilation practices as well as the impact of changes in modern house geometries. This online firefighter training program details the results of these experiments to provide knowledge the fire service can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Impact of Horizontal Ventilation Course Under the United States Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Assistance to Firefighter Grant Program, UL examined fire service ventilation practices as well as the impact of changes in modern house geometries. This online firefighter training program details the results of these experiments to provide knowledge the fire service can use to examine their thought processes, standard operating procedures and training content. Introduction to Fire Alarm Systems for Canadian Enforcement Officials - CAN/ULC-S524 This three and a half hour online course will focus on fire alarm systems and fire alarm system components in relation to the Building Code, with an emphasis towards the proper application of the requirements of CAN/ULC-S524 Standard for the Installation of Fire Alarm Systems. UL 28 Fire Laboratory Safety This web based training course provides an overview of the hazards present in the UL fire laboratory, which have hazards different from anything normally encountered at a work site. Contractors and customers who successfully complete this training course may work in the fire lab unescorted UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition eLearning Six Module Series This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Audio Evacuation and Smoke Control Systems This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in the UL 864 10th edition in the audio evacuation and smoke control systems section. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems - Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Combination Fire Alarm Systems This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in UL 864 from the 9th to 10th edition regarding combination fire alarm systems. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Construction and Electrical Supervision This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in the UL 864 10th edition in construction and electrical supervision. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Hardware and RF Tests This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in the UL 864 10th edition in Hardware and RF Tests. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Local and Releasing Services This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in the UL 864 10th edition regarding Local and Releasing Services. UL 864 Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems – Changes from the 9th to 10th Edition: Off-Premises Signaling This eLearning series introduces the changes from the UL 864 9th edition to the 10th edition: Control Units and Accessories for Fire Alarm Systems. This module covers the changes in the UL 864 10th edition regarding Off-Premises Signaling. Scheduled Public Workshops Code Compliant LED Retrofits for Luminaires and Signs      5/10/2016 San Jose, CA      9/20/2016 Northbrook, IL This instructor-led offering discusses market development and growing demand for both product retrofits and retrofitting electric signs with energy efficient LED technology, UL’s safety certification program for luminaire retrofits & retrofit sign kits, different types of Certified & signs retrofit kits available, the importance of sourcing the right kit for the application, installation instructions, and critical marking requirements. Designing LED Luminaires for Compliance to UL1598 and UL8750      6/23/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/1/2016 Fremont, CA      9/13/2016 Toronto, ON - UL This workshop covers the fundamental testing requirements, expected safety performance and recommended installation practices for Electric Luminaires, including LEDs listed under UL 1598 & UL 8750 and updated to comply with the 3rd Edition. Safety Compliance Guidelines for Luminaire Retrofits There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This half-day instructor-led training course discusses the market development and demand drivers for product retrofits, the UL safety certification program for luminaire retrofits , the different types of Certified retrofit kits available, the importance of sourcing the right kit for the application, critical marking requirements, and more. Safety Compliance Guidelines for Sign Retrofits There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This half-day instructor-led workshop discusses the growing demand for retrofitting electric signs with energy efficient LED technology. Participants will learn about UL’s safety certification program for retrofit sign kits, the different types of retrofit products available, the importance of finding the right kit for the application, the installation instructions, critical marking requirements, and more. UL Hazardous Locations Luminaire and Luminaire Fittings Certification to UL 844      10/26/2016 Northbrook, IL In this comprehensive one-day workshop, you will learn about the latest requirements in UL 844, the Standard for safety of luminaires and luminaire fittings for hazardous (classified) locations. Online Courses LED Light Source Design Essentials These modules provide an introduction to UL, its history, the types of certification services for lighting and an overview of the submission process. Additionally, comprehensive overviews of UL Standards and requirements for luminaires, UL 1598; LED luminaires, UL 8750; self-ballasted lamps and adapters, UL 1993; and low-voltage lighting, UL 2108 are covered. LED Equipment, UL 8750 This module covers the core requirements for compliance with the UL 8750 light emitting diode (LED) equipment for use in lighting products Standard. Luminaire, UL 1598 This module covers the core requirements for compliance to the Standard for luminaires, UL 1598. Self-ballasted Lamps, UL 1993 This module covers the core requirements for compliance to the Standard for self-ballasted lamps and lamp adapters, UL 1993. Low Voltage Lighting, UL 2108 This module covers the core requirements for compliance to UL 2108 for low voltage lighting systems. Programme en ligne d’enseignes lumineuses électriques UL 48 Ce programme comprend une série de cours qui traitent du programme d'inscription UL de base relatif aux enseignes, des exigences en matière de sécurité de base figurant dans la norme UL 48 qui s'appliquent à toutes les enseignes et des exigences particulières figurant dans la norme UL 48 qui s'appliquent à des types précis d'enseignes. Electric Signs Energy Efficiency Verification This course covers the technical requirements, compliance methods, and verification process for the ULE energy verification mark for electric signs to the state of California energy standards. Energy Efficiency Program Updates and UL Verification Services This course provides an update on the various North American Energy-Efficiency and LED Lighting Product Quality Programs such as ENERGY STAR ®, Lighting Facts, and Design Lights Consortium, as well as an overview of the UL Verification Services Business Unit. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Introduction to Zhaga This presentation introduces the Zhaga Consortium and explores its objectives, activities and approach towards enabling the interchangeability of LED light sources. LED Sign Construction Essentials The overall goal of this interactive 45 minute eLearning course is to improve consistency among UXYT Sign Manufacturers applying UL48 requirements while constructing factory build signs. LM-79 Performance Testing of Lamps and Luminaries (On-Demand) This 60-minute on-demand webinar provides an overview of how UL supports the performance testing of lamps and luminaires using photometric testing. During the first part of the webinar, we will discuss the types of goniophotometers and the differences between relative and absolute photometry. Then, we will review different types of photometric data and finally we discuss Energy Star Requirements. On-Demand: Introduction to IEC 62471 – Photobiological Safety of Lamps and Lamp Systems This one-hour on-demand webinar discusses the photobiological safety of lamps and lamp systems, including LEDs. This introductory course, IEC 62471 is intended to help those interested in understanding the basic concepts of IEC 62471 and how incoherent optical radiation is assessed. Outline of Requirements - LED Package Recognition Program - UL 8750 (On-Demand) This 40 minute On-Demand webinar will walk through the certification requirements for the LED Package. Based on industry request, UL has created a Component Recognition program for LED packages under the category Control Number OOQL2, additionally, OOQL8 provides certification for Canada. Recorded Webinar: Safety Compliance Guidelines for Luminaire Retrofits UL Principal Engineer Mike Shulman shares insight into the current state of the retrofit luminaire environment, retrofit kit selection and installation, critical marking requirements and much more in this one hour recorded virtual event. Signs UL 48 Online Curriculum This curriculum consists of a series of courses that cover the basic UL Listing Program for Signs, the basic safety requirements in UL 48 that apply to all signs, and the specific requirements in UL 48 that apply to select types of signs, such as neon, LED, fluorescent, incandescent, and HID. This curriculum is designed for training of electric sign designers, engineers, specifiers, construction and assembly staff, and installers. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. UL 48 Electric Signs, Program Overview This course provides a high-level overview of the UL resources for the Sign Industry, with a concentration on the requirements of UL 48. UL 48 SignSmart Guide General Coverage Tool This interactive tool determines if a sign design is eligible for UL’s General Coverage program. A final evaluation must be done using the program requirements found in the current Standard UL 48 for Electric Signs, the Follow-Up Inspection Instructions (FUII) for Electric Signs, the Sign Component Manual (SAM) and the UL Report. UL Solid State Lighting Component Programs for Luminaires This course covers UL’s component categories and programs for SSL lighting. UL Update, LED Market Trends, and Tips to Efficiently Navigate the Certification Process This course provides an overview of UL’s current business, macro trends relating to the LED Lighting industry, and tips to aid in navigating the certification process more efficiently. UL’s General Coverage Program For LED Surface-mounted and Recessed Luminaires Gain critical knowledge on UL’s General Coverage Program for LED surface-mounted and recessed luminaires that have bi-pin lamp holders and LED tube lamps. Scheduled Public Workshops Lightning Protection Installation Standard Review      4/19/2016 Dallas, TX      5/17/2016 Philadelphia, PA      6/8/2016 St. Louis, MO      8/17/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Denver, CO      11/16/2016 Phoenix, AZ In this two-day workshop you will learn the key elements of UL 96A and its practical application. Online Courses Oil & Gas Bundle UL has developed the most comprehensive library of Energy-related courses in the Energy sector, including upstream, midstream and downstream operations. Cathodic Protection Equipment Maintenance Corrosion maintenance is introduced in this module. Compressors: Reciprocating and Centrifugal This is an introduction to the reciprocating compressor. Covered topics include: general operations, capabilities and limitations of compressors, engine components and mechanics and the connection to the prime mover. Controllers and Final Control Elements This course provides an overview of three major functions of a control system: control valves, controllers and final control elements. Corrosion Principles and Prevention This course explains the principles of corrosion and components of a corrosion cell. Dispatching (Controlling) and Hydraulics This course explains pipeline dispatching, batch tracking and interface tracking. It describes pipeline facility equipment such as pumps, motors and valves and their use in manipulating the control point of an operating line. Dispatching: Normal, Abnormal, and Emergency Operations This course describes the duties of a pipeline dispatcher during normal, abnormal and emergency operations. During normal operations the dispatcher routinely monitors and changes product flow and delivery point. DOT Part 192: Code Regulations This course explains that pipelines are operated under a variety of federal and state regulations and industry standards intended to ensure public and environmental safety and health. DOT Part 195: Accident Reporting Procedures This course explains DOT procedures for reporting accidents, spills and safety-related conditions. The use of the “5 day confirmed/10 day discovered” rule is also defined. Part 195 is the guideline defining what to report and how and when to report accidents. DOT Part 195: Code Regulations This course explains the history of pipeline regulations, the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act and the events leading to the formation of the Federal Power Commission (FPC), the Office of Pipeline Safety (OPS) and DOT. Emergency Preparation Recognition and Response This course discusses emergency preparedness, which includes plans, training and equipment. Emergency Response Guidebook: Purpose and Uses This course reviews the terminology and situations associated with emergencies in the pipeline industry. Emergency Response Planning Control and Communication This course explores emergency response planning control and communication. Emergency Response: Hazardous Spill This course provides the learner with an overview of hazardous spills from time of occurrence, through control, confinement and decontamination to termination. Emergency Spill Response Simulation In this course the learner responds to two spill simulations by making decisions to halt and clean up a spill. Encroachments and Easements This course addresses encroachment and easement terminology, and proactive measures that companies take to prevent encroaching activity. Environmental Regulation This course explains that employees must be able to communicate about environmental issues. Gas Gathering Systems This course provides a general introduction to gas gathering systems and their functions. Gas Line Repair and Maintenance This course discusses the types of common repairs of leaking gas lines and typical repair methods used such as encapsulation and direct burial. Gas Pipeline Emergency Response Simulation This course describes emergency response situations. The learner will be required to identify which of two situations require an emergency response. The first situation includes a contractor that, while digging over a pipeline, strikes the line. An explosion occurs and gas escapes from the line. The second situation involves a crack in a line as oil is drained from an on-site product tank. The oil is contained within the tank’s dike. Health Hazards and Material Safety Data Sheets This course introduces learners to the dangers associated with hazardous materials and/or substances and provides an overview of the Material Safety Data Sheet (MSDS). Incident Command System: Responsibilities This course reviews the Incident Command System (ICS) Structure and Components module that defines what, who and how ICS is used. It takes a detailed look at the responsibilities of ICS personnel and how these responsibilities apply to an emergency situation. The performance of the Incident Commander, the Safety Officer, the Liaison Officer and others are covered. Incident Command System: Structure and Components This course defines the Incident Command System (ICS), why it was created, the structure including its major components and its importance and use. Introduction to Process Control This course defines process control and its importance. Methods of measuring temperature, pressure, flow, level, speed and temperature are examined. Leaks: Investigation and Safety Issues This course explains leak investigation and the investigator’s primary mission of public safety and protecting property are described. Line Pipe Fundamentals This course discusses the properties and grade of line pipe: carbon, manganese, yield point, yield strength, pressure rating and associated industry standards. Liquefied Petroleum Gas: Characteristics and Handling This course presents the nature and characteristics of highly volatile liquids (HVL). Mainline Valve Functions This course covers the following mainline valve types: ball, gate and plug plus the valve components and sealing elements. Measuring Liquid Products This course discusses various types of meters including turbine and positive displacement meters. Natural Gas Safety This course presents information about the hazards you need to be aware of when working around natural gas, as well as the steps you should take to protect yourself. Personal Protection and Spill Containment Equipment This course focuses on Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) and leak/spill containment used when dealing with potentially hazardous situations. Petroleum Products: Safe Handling and Storage This course provides you with the information needed to safely handle and store petroleum products, protect yourself, your co-workers and the environment. Pipeline Locating and Marking This course focuses on the importance of locating and marking the pipeline and other facilities associated with the pipeline. Pipeline Maintenance Practices This course discusses pipeline problem discovery, notification and repair plans, including line shutdown and excavation according to Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) requirements. Pump Station Operating Principles and Equipment This course explains concepts such as viscosity, density, friction and specific gravity. RCRA Requirements This course explains the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA), which regulates the management of solid and hazardous waste. Relief Valve Functions This course explains overpressure, ruptures and monitor regulators. It discusses the design and operation of relief valves as well as the testing, maintenance and inspection of overpressure protection devices. Respirators: Air-Purifying This course explains testing, use and maintenance of air-purifying respirators, including their components and functions. Respirators: Air-Supplied This course explains the testing, use, storing and maintenance of air-supplied respirators. It explains donning, replacing and storage of Self Contained Breathing Apparatus (SCBA) tanks and cylinder regulators. Respirators: Components and Functions The course introduces three respirator types – air purifying, airline and Self Contained Breathing Apparatus (SCBA), with an overview of the capabilities and limitations of each. Respirators: Selection, Donning, and Maintenance This course explains the capability and limitations of air purifying, air line and Self Contained Breathing Apparatus (SCBA) respirators. Safety Hazards and Equipment This course provides the learner with an overview of hazardous spills from time of occurrence, through control, confinement and decontamination to termination. Safety Programs and Procedures This course provides an overview of the field applications of safety concepts with emphasis on protection and prevention. Spill Prevention and Response Procedures This course covers the importance of spill prevention including what constitutes a spill and whether or not it is reportable. Storage Tanks and Handline Tank Gauging This course describes the types of above-ground liquid storage tanks and the significance of their roof style. Trenching and Excavation Fundamentals This course describes the fundamentals of trenching and excavation and how to become a “competent person.” Scheduled Public Workshops Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      5/10/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/27/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive two-day workshop will give you the latest information on plastic materials intended for use in electrical products, plus provide extensive information about UL tests, ratings and requirements for plastics. You’ll also learn where the IEC stands with regard to plastics and how to use UL’s Plastics Directory to select the right recognized plastic materials for your products. Electrical Insulation Systems UL 1446      7/26/2016 Enfield, CT      9/7/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive one-day workshop will give you the latest information on electrical insulation systems and system components, plus provide extensive information about UL tests, ratings and requirements for magnet wire coatings, magnet wire, varnishes, and insulation systems. Introduction to Long Term Thermal Aging (LTTA) – UL 746B Overview There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This highly interactive one-day workshop will give you an overview of long term thermal aging test program, including use of a control material, test specimens, establishing the test program. You’ll also be introduced to the data analysis techniques used to establish the temperature ratings of the material. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Use in Photovoltaic Module Applications There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. The purpose of this two-day workshop is to increase your awareness of the safety issues involved with selecting polymeric materials used in photovoltaic applications. A series of lectures and classroom exercises have been designed to enhance your skills in selecting materials for specific functional applications. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. A one day interactive workshop that will enable customers to better understand the way UL 94 flammability testing gets performed by UL testing personnel. UL’s Electrical Insulation Systems Customer Roundtable      7/27/2016 Enfield, CT UL’s Performance Materials Division is hosting a free Electrical Insulation Systems Customer Roundtable event for UL client’s to meet UL experts and other peers in the industry. Register Today! UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      10/19/2016 Northbrook, IL This highly interactive one-day workshop will provide the latest information on UL’s two main label programs: Marking & Labeling Systems and Authorized Label Supplier. Online Courses Introduction to IEEE 1776(2008): Recommended Practice for Thermal Evaluation of Unsealed or Sealed Insulation Systems for AC Electric Machinery Employing Form-wound Pre-Insulated Stator Coils for machine Rated 15000 V and Below This thirty-minute eLearning presentation will give you a complete overview of form-wound insulation systems that are used at voltages exceeding 1000 V. Typical applications include wind turbine generators, motors having large frame size and horsepower ratings, and large industrial generators (greater than 1.5 megawatts.) Scheduled Public Workshops Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings      4/26/2016 Northbrook, IL      5/4/2016 Brea, CA      5/17/2016 St. Louis, MO      5/24/2016 Toronto, ON - UL      5/24/2016 Atlanta, GA      5/24/2016 Oklahoma City, OK      5/24/2016 Anchorage, AK      6/7/2016 Phoenix, AZ      6/7/2016 Detroit, MI      6/14/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      6/14/2016 Providence, RI      6/22/2016 Raleigh, NC      7/12/2016 South Bend, IN      7/20/2016 Camas, WA      8/9/2016 Columbus, OH      8/23/2016 Tulsa, OK      9/13/2016 Dallas, TX      9/20/2016 Brea, CA      9/28/2016 Appleton, WI      10/12/2016 Seattle, WA      10/18/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/18/2016 Wichita, KS      11/9/2016 Vancouver, B.C. This comprehensive one and a half-day workshop provides technical information to industrial control panel professionals. The workshop is ideal for those who need to understand the safety compliance requirements of the UL 508A Standard for industrial control panels, as well as the new requirements found in the National Electrical Code (NEC) Article 409 and UL 508A Supplement B. Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings & UL 698A 3rd Edition, Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations - Bundled Workshop      4/26/2016 Northbrook, IL      5/24/2016 Oklahoma City, OK      6/14/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      7/20/2016 Camas, WA      8/23/2016 Tulsa, OK      9/13/2016 Dallas, TX      10/18/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/18/2016 Wichita, KS This comprehensive two day workshop provides technical information to industrial control panel professionals. The workshop is ideal for those who need to understand the requirements of the UL 508A Standard for industrial control panels, as well as the new requirements found in the National Electrical Code (NEC) Article 409 and UL 508A Supplement B, and how to construct industrial control panels for use in hazard locations per UL 698A. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/3/2016 Dallas, TX      7/12/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/11/2016 Princeton, NJ This three-day course provides a thorough understanding of how to effectively design for compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition. The content and activities covered in this course will help you gain practical skills and enhance your technical understanding of the standard. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC This workshop provides detailed information on how to specify, implement and validate safety-related control systems for machinery to establish conformance with regulations and standards. UL’s Transition from UL 508C to UL 61800-5-1      6/23/2016 Melville, NY - UL      11/8/2016 Northbrook, IL This one-day workshop provides an in-depth examination of the certification requirements for UL 61800-5-1, Adjustable Speed Electrical Power Drive Systems - Part 5-1: Safety Requirements - Electrical, Thermal and Energy. A Review of UL/IEC61010-1 and Specific Safety Requirements for Programmable Logic Controllers: UL/IEC61010-2-201      7/20/2016 Northbrook, IL      10/11/2016 Raleigh, NC Review the basic safety requirements in UL/IEC61010-1, the Standard for Safety for Measurement, Control and Laboratory Equipment and gain an in-depth understanding of the safety requirements that specifically apply to Programmable Logic Controllers in UL/IEC61010-2-201. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Automotive Functional Safety in Compliance with ISO 26262:2011      9/27/2016 Detroit, MI With the rising role of electronics in multiple systems and sub-systems within an automobile, functional safety has increasingly become a critical aspect of the overall automobile product design and development. Learn from the experts at UL on Functional Safety. This interactive three day workshop focuses on the requirements of ISO 26262:2001 Road Vehicles – Functional Safety and prepares you to meet the challenges for compliance. Electrical Safety and Arc Flash Prevention      8/9/2016 Raleigh, NC      10/4/2016 Northbrook, IL In this two day workshop, you will learn the general requirements of the 2015 edition of NFPA 70E Standard for Electrical Safety in the Workplace® to guide you in setting up, creating the appropriate documentation and procedures, and following an electrical safety program for compliance with OSHA 1910 Subpart S and OSHA 1926 Subpart K. Functional Safety Training      9/14/2016 Northbrook, IL Whenever safety depends on the correctness of certain functionality, be this the flap control in an aircraft, the flame detection in a burner furnace, or the lid interlock of a washing machine, a case of “functional safety” is present. To achieve and demonstrate functional safety is particularly challenging, especially if such functionality is implemented in complex microelectronics and software. Specific Safety Requirements for AC Semiconductor Motor Controllers and Starters: UL 60947-4-2      5/11/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/7/2016 Melville, NY - UL      10/11/2016 Northbrook, IL Review the basic safety requirements in UL 60947-1, the Standard for Low-Voltage Switchgear and Control gear as they pertain to AC Semiconductor Motor Controllers and Starters, and gain an in-depth understanding of the safety requirements of UL 60947-4-2, the Standard for AC Semiconductor Motor Controllers and Starters. Switchboards - Designing for Compliance to UL 891 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This one-day workshop will explore the range of UL services from product submittal to field evaluation. In addition, our expert engineers will review the entire scope and requirements that fall under UL 891 for Safety for Dead-Front Switchboards. UL 698A 3rd Edition, Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations      4/27/2016 Northbrook, IL      5/25/2016 Oklahoma City, OK      6/15/2016 Fargo, North Dakota      7/21/2016 Camas, WA      8/24/2016 Tulsa, OK      9/14/2016 Dallas, TX      10/19/2016 Minneapolis, MN      10/19/2016 Wichita, KS This comprehensive half-day workshop focuses on how to construct general use industrial control panels for use in hazardous locations in accordance with the UL 698A Third Edition Industrial Control Panels Relating to Hazardous (Classified) Locations. Online Courses Enclosure Design: Product Safety Considerations Learn the key product safety considerations for enclosure design. AFCI Basics Training Course This course will help electrical system installers complete the trouble-free installation of Arc-Fault Circuit-Interrupter (AFCI) circuit breakers. It also describes what they should do in the unlikely event that unwanted tripping should occur. An Engineer's Roadmap to SIL Compliance - Recorded Webinar Design engineers that optimize system design from the beginning for SIL (Safety Integrity Level) compliance are able save time and money for their company. “SIL (Safety Integrity Level) compliance” or “SIL certified” is commonly referred to as a synonym for compliance/certification with IEC 61508 or a standard derived from IEC 61508. Avoid Design Pitfalls by Streamlining Enclosure Certification - Recorded Webinar Enclosure manufacturers that optimize their design process from the beginning are able save time and money for their company. Environmental ratings, i.e. Types 1, 3R, 4, 4X, 12, 13 and IP20, IP54, IP66, IP67, and IP69, are a critical part of the design process. UL 50E and IEC 60529, respectively, define the requirements for environmental ratings required for installations. Designing for Safety Compliance in Industrial Control Panels, UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings eLearning This on-demand course is intended to provide the necessary skills to navigate the Standard for Safety, UL 508A, Industrial Control Panels (ICPs). This course also serves as a refresher for existing panel shops and individuals desiring further knowledge and understanding of the UL 508A requirements. Electric Vehicle Charging System Installation This is a 2 1/2 hour, self-paced course intended for qualified electricians who will be tasked with the end-to-end installation of residential and/or commercial Electric Vehicle Charging System (EVCS) and equipment. Free Webinar: UL Cybersecurity Assurance Program –evaluating network-connectable products and systems per common security requirements      4/26/2016 ReadyTalk (Online) This free 60-minute live webinar explains the new UL 2900 series of standards. These standards provide testable cybersecurity criteria to help manufacturers reduce software vulnerabilities and weaknesses, minimize exploitation, address known malware, and increase security awareness in their products. Recorded Webinar - Polymeric Materials – Direct Support Requirements RECORDED WEBINAR: UL Knowledge Services together with the National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA) is pleased to offer this webinar. Ensure your low-voltage control gear is compliant with applicable direct support requirements. Come away from this webinar, recorded from September 24, 2008, with a better understanding of the material properties your industrial control products must meet. Recorded Webinar - Polymeric Materials – Insulation Systems RECORDED WEBINAR - recorded on October 8, 2008: UL Knowledge Services together with the National Electrical Manufacturers Association (NEMA) is pleased to bring you a webinar on Polymeric Materials - Insulation Systems. Recorded Webinar: 508A 2nd Edition Update with UL Principal Engineer, John Kovacik John Kovacik, UL’s Principal Engineer for Industrial Control Panels, provides an insider’s look at the detailed changes relevant to the 2nd Edition of UL 508A. Recorded Webinar: Global Market Access – UL Combined Projects for Drives (UL/IEC 61800-5-1) UL experts highlight the cost and time advantages of using bundled product certification. UL/IEC 61800-5-1, which provides market access to Europe, North America and Asia for adjustable speed motor drives through one test program. UL – the certification leader in North America for adjustable speed drives – is accredited by the Conformity Assessment (CB/IECEE) scheme. Recorded Webinar: UL 62109 - Power Converters for Use in PV Systems Discuss the scope, requirements and submittal process for the new UL/IEC 62109 standard that is derived from the existing UL 1741 standard for photovoltaic power conversion equipment. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 & 2 Gain an understanding of the requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 1 Gain an understanding of the basic requirements for third-party evaluation and certification of products installed in the workplace. Third-Party Certification Requirements for Unevaluated Electrical Equipment - Part 2 Gain an understanding of NFPA 790 (2014) the Standard for Competency of Third-Party Field Evaluations and NFPA 791 (2014), Recommended Practice Procedures for Unlabeled Electrical Equipment Evaluations. Scheduled Public Workshops Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      10/4/2016 Raleigh, NC This workshop provides detailed information on how to specify, implement and validate safety-related control systems for machinery to establish conformance with regulations and standards. Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques (ASSET)™      6/21/2016 Northbrook, IL      9/20/2016 Fremont, CA The two-day course on Applied Safety Science and Engineering Techniques merges Safety Science and Hazard Based Safety Engineering principles within the overall framework of a safety management process. The objective of this ASSET Process is to achieve, maintain and continuously improve safety. Automotive Functional Safety in Compliance with ISO 26262:2011      9/27/2016 Detroit, MI With the rising role of electronics in multiple systems and sub-systems within an automobile, functional safety has increasingly become a critical aspect of the overall automobile product design and development. Learn from the experts at UL on Functional Safety. This interactive three day workshop focuses on the requirements of ISO 26262:2001 Road Vehicles – Functional Safety and prepares you to meet the challenges for compliance. Functional Safety Training      9/14/2016 Northbrook, IL Whenever safety depends on the correctness of certain functionality, be this the flap control in an aircraft, the flame detection in a burner furnace, or the lid interlock of a washing machine, a case of “functional safety” is present. To achieve and demonstrate functional safety is particularly challenging, especially if such functionality is implemented in complex microelectronics and software. Online Courses Introduction to Hazard-Based Safety Engineering An introduction to the principles of Hazard-Based Safety Engineering. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) and Risk Management A high-level overview of risk management techniques in relation to Hazard Based Safety Engineering (HBSE). Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Premise for Injury Gain a high-level understanding of the Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Premise for Injury: Energy Transfer Model. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Process An examination of the HBSE process of product evaluation by analysis of energy sources, transfer means and mitigation. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Injury Fault Tree Model An introduction to the Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Injury Fault Tree Model. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) Applications A high-level overview of different applications of Hazard Based Safety Engineering for various forms of sources, transfer means and entities susceptible to harm. Introduction to Functional Safety Learn the basic elements of functional safety and gain the knowledge needed to apply relevant standards effectively. Hazard-based Safety Engineering (HBSE) On-Demand Webinar This on-demand webinar introduces viewers to the basic concepts of Hazard-based Safety Engineering (HBSE) and the value of using HBSE to achieve an accurate safety assessment and or inspection. Thermal Injury Risk Gain a high-level introduction to the various components which influence the event of a thermal burn injury and learn the safeguards for protecting against thermal burn. Online Courses Safety Standards Course Bundle Gain an extensive understanding of regulatory standards for products including insight into how standards are created, the harmonization of international standards, as well as how standards are applied through different codes, certification programs and governing authorities. Completion awards CEUs. Introduction to Standards A high-level introduction to safety standards explaining what they are, why they are important and how to identify the key elements. Types of Standards and How They Are Used Identify different types of standards and learn how some are defined by a group, some by a purpose and how they are used in different scenarios. Standards Development Organizations Learn why Standards Development Organizations (SDOs) are important and how participation in development committees work. Standards Development and Maintenance Process A high-level introduction to the Standards development and maintenance process. Standards Harmonization Learn the purpose of and process for the harmonization of regional and international standards. International Standards Gain insight into International Standards, as well as key standards organizations, their creation process and how participation in these organizations works. Applying Standards Learn how standards are applied and enforced by governing authorities, codes, certification programs and conformity assessment requirements. UL Standards and Processes Learn about the development process, use and structure of UL Standards. Online Courses Code Authorities & Codes Course Bundle Key to designing products for installation is understanding the core requirements of regulatory codes and the relationship between the product, AHJ’s (Authorities Having Jurisdiction) and certification bodies such as UL. In these modules you’ll gain that understanding as well as insight to help protect the people and equipment that must comply with codes such as the NEC® and NFPA 70E. Completion awards CEUs. National Electrical Code® (NEC) Overview A high-level overview of the National Electrical Code (NEC). The National Electrical Code® and UL Gain insight into the relationship between NEC, UL and other key certifying organizations. Navigating the National Electrical Code®: Code Arrangement Gain insight into the arrangement of the National Electrical Code® (NEC). Navigating the National Electrical Code®: General and Core Requirements Learn the general and core requirements of the National Electrical Code® (NEC). Revising the National Electrical Code® Gain insight into the processes involved for revising the National Electrical Code® (NEC). A Code Official's Guide to UL Learn how UL’s certifications and online directories help code officials achieve safe, code compliant installations. Understanding and Using the UL White Book An introduction to the UL White Book and its use to determine compliance with the National Electrical Code (NEC). Introduction to NFPA® 70E - Electrical Safety in the Workplace Learn the key aspects of NFPA® 70E as it applies to hazards associated with electrical energy during the installation, operation and maintenance of electrical equipment. Navigating the Wire and Cable Marking Guide Gain an in-depth understanding of the components of the Wire and Cable Marking and Application Guide and the usage requirements of the Wire and Cable Marking Tables 1, 2, and 3. Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) for Electric Shock and Arc Flash Hazards A high-level overview of the Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) required when the potential exists for exposure to electric shock and arc flash hazards. The Nature of Incident Energy and Means for Mitigating the Arc Flash Hazards Learn how incident energy is determined and how to mitigate arc flash hazards. Online Courses UL Programs Course Bundle Discover UL, the worlds most trusted Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory, and the programs and systems that help our customers gain safety certification including in introduction to Follow Up Services, UL’s Data Acceptance Program, the UL Online Certification Directory and much more. Introduction to UL An introduction to UL, discussing its history, the purpose of the UL Mark, available types of certifications and the project submission process. UL Process From Quote to UL Mark Gain insight into the process for obtaining the UL mark, from requesting a quote all the way to printing and applying labels to the product. An Introduction to the Data Acceptance Program A high-level overview of the Data Acceptance Program (DAP) including the main requirements for participation and the different types of testing relationships. An Overview of Follow-up Services An introduction to UL’s Follow Up Services (FUS) program, describing how it works and why it is such an important part of the UL certification process. Overview of UL’s Global Component Services Learn how UL’s Component Certification Program can help ensure product and brand integrity remain consistent at each stage in the development and compliance lifecycle. UL Online Certifications Directory and How to Use It Learn about the UL certifications directory and how to use its interactive search functionality. Introduction to UL Global Market Access Wireless Services Gain insight into the complex global wireless market, the challenges existing wireless (RF) standards pose and the role UL plays in helping manufacturers bring wireless products to market in a compliant and cost-effective manner. Discovering the Enhanced UL Mark Explore the key features and benefits of the enhanced UL Certification Mark and Badge system. Introduction to UL’s Greenguard Certification Gain an overview of the UL GREENGUARD Certification Program and learn its value to the marketplace for selecting products that contain low chemical and Volatile Organic Compound (VOCs) emissions. How to Design a UL Label An overview of how to design a UL Mark label, including the different types of UL marks, elements of the mark, where to get information for different types of products, how to get the mark printed, and the UL artwork approval process. Online Courses Global Market Access Course Bundle Learn what’s necessary to build a global compliance strategy for your product and take a deeper look into the compliance requirements of a variety of regions around the world. You’ll gain an understanding of everything from mandatory certifications and voluntary safety marks to privately issued requirements and the process for obtaining certification in a specific country or region. Completion awards CEUs. Compliance Fundamentals for Global Market Access Learn the importance of international compliance and its impact on global market access. Global Compliance Strategy A high-level overview of effective global compliance strategy and how it can improve product acceptance in international markets. Product Safety Requirements for Argentina Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Argentina and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Brazil Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into Brazil and learn the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for China Market Access Learn about key compliance requirements for market entry into China including the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Europe Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Europe and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for India Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into India and learn the process of obtaining the necessary certification(s) and associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Japan Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Japan and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Korea Market Access Learn the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Korea and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Mexico Market Access Gain insight into the detailed compliance requirements for market entry into Mexico and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Russia, Belarus and Kazakhstan Market Access Explore the compliance requirements for market entry into Russia, Belarus, and Kazakhstan and learn the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Product Safety Requirements for Saudi Arabia Market Access Learn the compliance requirements for market entry into Saudi Arabia and the process for obtaining the necessary certification(s) and managing associated maintenance requirements. Online Courses Hazard Based Safety Engineering Course Bundle Hazard-Based Safety Engineering addresses product safety design strategies in terms of fundamental engineering concepts. Learn how to apply HBSE principals and risk management techniques in a variety of ways by analyzing sources of hazardous energy and exploring HBSE models such as Injury Fault Tree Model and Energy Transfer Model. Completion awards CEUs. Introduction to Hazard-Based Safety Engineering An introduction to the principles of Hazard-Based Safety Engineering. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) and Risk Management A high-level overview of risk management techniques in relation to Hazard Based Safety Engineering (HBSE). Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Premise for Injury Gain a high-level understanding of the Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Premise for Injury: Energy Transfer Model. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Process An examination of the HBSE process of product evaluation by analysis of energy sources, transfer means and mitigation. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Injury Fault Tree Model An introduction to the Hazard-Based Safety Engineering Injury Fault Tree Model. Hazard-Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) Applications A high-level overview of different applications of Hazard Based Safety Engineering for various forms of sources, transfer means and entities susceptible to harm. Introduction to Functional Safety Learn the basic elements of functional safety and gain the knowledge needed to apply relevant standards effectively. Online Courses Processes and Tools Course Bundle Learn tools to get to market faster and with fewer variations by harnessing Lean and Six Sigma methodologies. These modules cover different tools used in building a lean six sigma process, the roles necessary for a successful implementation and a case study demonstrating the concepts in practice. Completion awards CEUs. Lean Six Sigma Overview A high-level overview of the concepts of Lean and Six Sigma. Lean Six Sigma Principles and Core Methodologies Examine the fundamental principles, key tools and core methodologies of Lean Six Sigma. Lean Six Sigma Leadership and Improvement Teams Learn the importance of the functional roles necessary to achieve a successful Lean Six Sigma implementation. Lean Six Sigma Case Study A dynamic case study featuring examples of Lean Six Sigma concepts. Online Courses Conformity Assessment Course Bundle Learn a framework for analyzing and understanding conformity assessment practices by exploring the demand drivers for conformity, methods to demonstrate conformity, and concepts to help increase the likelihood of assessment fulfillment critical to anyone relying upon, completing or providing conformity assessment. Completion awards CEUs. Introduction to Conformity Assessment - ISO/IEC 17000 Learn the process flow of Conformity Assessment according to ISO/IEC International Standard 17000. Understanding the Demand for Conformity Assessment Gain insight into the demand drivers for Conformity Assessment and learn how and why it can increase the likelihood of fulfillment. Conformity Assessment in Practice: Schemes Explore the detailed activities required to carry out a Conformity Assessment per the Functional Approach in ISO/IEC 17000. Understanding 1st, 2nd, and 3rd Parties An overview of the people and entities generally referred to as 1st, 2nd, and 3rd parties as they relate to Conformity Assessment. Test, Inspection and Certification (TIC) Concepts Gain an understanding of the methods used to demonstrate conformity including testing, inspection and certification. Accreditation and the ISO/IEC 170xx Standards Increase your understanding of how Accreditation applies to Conformity Assessment and how it relates to the ISO/IEC Standards in the 170xx series. Online Courses Regulatory & Trade / Government Affairs Course Bundle Explore the role the United States product safety system plays in trade facilitation for manufacturers. Learn about the role of government programs and key organizations impacting products for the US market as well as the importance of voluntary consensus standards in the absence of federal regulation. Completion awards CEUs. Understanding the ENERGY STAR® Program Gain an understanding of how the ENERGY STAR® Program promotes energy efficiency across the globe and learn how to join, qualify products and about the program’s future goals for international harmonization. Federal Government and Voluntary Consensus Standards (OMB A-119 & NTTAA) Learn why voluntary consensus standards are important and how they are used by the US federal government. US Product Safety System: CPSC v. OSHA Gain an understanding of the US product safety system with a particular focus on the regulatory jurisdictions of the Consumer Product Safety Commission and Occupational Safety and Health Administration. Online Courses Social Auditing and Responsible Sourcing Course Bundle Explore the steps toward building a responsible sourcing cycle including social compliance monitoring best practices and the impacts of Dodd-Frank and the use of conflict minerals in end products. Completion awards CEUs. Conflict Minerals and the Dodd-Frank Act A high-level overview of the Dodd-Frank Act, its background and impact on companies that use conflict minerals in the manufacturing of their products is provided in this course. Introduction to Social Compliance Monitoring An introduction to social compliance and the responsible sourcing cycle which includes supply chain monitoring, research and program development is provided in this course. Online Courses Sustainability Course Bundle Gain an understanding of the strategies and benefits of implementing “green” practices in the design, marketing, and purchasing functions for your organization. Completion awards CEUs. Introduction to Sustainability Gain a basic understanding of the terms, benefits, opportunities and trends in sustainability as a means of achieving cost savings through energy and resource efficiencies. Design for Sustainability A high-level introduction to the concepts of Design for Sustainability (DfS). Green Marketing An examination of “Green” marketing including ecolabelling, greenwashing and how to make defensible claims. Green Purchasing An introduction to the concept and benefits of green purchasing and strategies for implementing affordable green purchasing policies. Online Courses Transaction Security Course Bundle Build knowledge around Near Field Communication and Machine to Machine transactional security technologies incorporated into a variety of consumer technology products. Completion awards CEUs. Transaction Security: An Introduction to NFC Technology An introduction to NFC (Near Field Communication) technology for consumer technology manufacturers. Transaction Security: Introduction to M2M An introduction to M2M (machine to machine) technology for consumer technology manufacturers. Online Courses Critical Components Course Bundle Gain knowledge of certification criteria and safe design practices for common product components that are critical to the integrity of new products subject to certification and follow-up surveillance. Topics cover a range of key components from common plastics to complex high-tech sub-assemblies and industrial controls. Completion awards CEUs. Printed Wiring Boards Learn how to recognize and evaluate the suitability of Printed Wiring Boards (PWBs) for their application in electrical products. Overcurrent Protection: Circuit Breakers and Fuses Gain an understanding of the use and application of circuit breakers and fuses as the primary means of overcurrent protection required by the National Electrical Code (NEC). Relays Gain an understanding of the use and application of relays as a means to control various types of current loads in end-use equipment. Enclosure Design: Product Safety Considerations Learn the key product safety considerations for enclosure design. Polymeric Materials Gain a high-level understanding of the characteristics and structures of polymers and the corresponding test ratings and procedures. Online Courses Electrical Safety Course Bundle Mitigating electrical and fire risks are at the heart of product safety and compliance. Explore the hazard and mitigation techniques associated with electrically-caused injury as well as key practices for use of electrical insulation, information on clearance and creepage determinations and much more. Completion awards CEUs. Electric Shock Explore the hazard and mitigation techniques associated with electricity and electric shock as they relate to product safety and product design. Electrical Insulation Understand the purpose of insulation as a means of protection from electric shock and identify the different types and uses of electrical insulation. Spacings Gain essential information to help you determine whether clearance and creepage distances designed into electrical products are compliant with applicable safety requirements. Groundings and Bondings Learn the key terms and basic principles associated with grounding and bonding for safe delivery of electrical energy to products and facilities. Online Courses Global Directives Course Bundle Accessing the global marketplace means understanding the directives which facilitate product safety across countries. Understand the materials, chemicals, and environmental restrictions required to access to the European Union as well as how they impact those in the manufacturing supply chain. Completion awards CEUs. The ATEX Directive for Hazardous Locations A high-level introduction to the European Standards listed in the ATEX Directive for Hazardous Locations. Introduction to the REACH Directive Gain a high-level overview of the European Chemical Legislation REACH, an integrated system for the registration, evaluation, authorization and restriction of chemicals. Introduction to the RoHS Directive Explore the European Union’s (EU) Restriction of the Use of Certain Hazardous Substances in Electrical and Electronic Equipment (RoHS) Directive and learn the key requirements for manufacturers, distributors, and importers. Introduction to the WEEE Directive An examination of the Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment (WEEE) Directive including general information, specific requirements, global impacts and strategies for compliance. Online Courses Hazardous Location Risks Course Bundle Discover specific risks as well as the concepts for intrinsically safety and how to identify, classify and control hazardous locations. Designing for Intrinsic Safety An overview of intrinsic safety concepts and exploration of the requirements for intrinsic safety as outlined in IEC 60079-11. Introduction to Hazardous Locations Gain a high-level understanding of the world of Hazardous locations and learn how areas are identified, classified and controlled. Thermal Injury Risk Gain a high-level introduction to the various components which influence the event of a thermal burn injury and learn the safeguards for protecting against thermal burn. Online Courses Wireless Requirements Course Bundle Explore the process for certification of products utilizing radio and wireless technology when accessing new markets. European Radio Equipment Self Certification Overview Gain a high-level introduction to the radio equipment self-certification requirements for European Union market access. North American Radio Equipment Certification Overview A high-level overview of the certification requirements for radio transmitting equipment in the US and Canada including the differences between US and Canadian certification, the process for certification and required documentation. Online Courses Supply Connections Course Bundle Learn basic safety requirements and installation codes for permanently wired connections and plug and cord connections for electrical equipment. Completion awards CEUs. Permanently Wired Connections Learn the where, when, and how of permanently wired connections and the corresponding requirements for product standards and installation codes. Plug and Cord Connections Learn how to identify and define the safety requirements for plug and cord connections related to electrical equipment. Scheduled Public Workshops Fire Forum Training There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Fire Doors, Frames, Seals and associated Hardware There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. PPE - Personal Protective Equipment There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Protection of Exterior Walls from Fire Spread There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Plastics and selection criteria for use in components and end products (Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical) in accordance with UL 94, UL 746 A - D      5/26/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/17/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/17/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      9/27/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings      6/1/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      12/6/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Transition from UL 508C to UL 61800-5-1      7/5/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      12/1/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. A Review of UL/IEC61010-1 and Specific Safety Requirements for Programmable Logic Controllers: UL/IEC61010-2-201      10/11/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language A Review of UL/IEC61010-1 and Specific Safety Requirements for Programmable Logic Controllers: UL/IEC61010-2-201 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing for Compliance to UL 60730: Automatic Electrical Controls for Household and Similar Use This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Electrical Standard for Industrial Machinery (NFPA 79, 2015 Edition)      10/26/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Introduction to the Basic Requirements of the National Electrical Code (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      10/27/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      11/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics - and the right selection in accordance with UL 94 & UL 746A-D      11/23/2016 Krefeld-Uerdingen, Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      6/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      9/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/13/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Specific Safety Requirements for AC Semiconductor Motor Controllers and Starters: UL 60947-4-2      6/28/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/30/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL 1446: Electrical Insulation Systems (Class A, E, B, F, H used in Motors, Transformers, Bobbins) for USA Market Access      6/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL 1446: Insulation Systems (Class A, E, B, F, H used in Motors, Transformers, Bobbins) for USA Market Access      9/27/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      6/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      6/21/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings      11/30/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Designing for Compliance to UL 60730: Automatic Electrical Controls for Household and Similar Use Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      5/24/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      11/22/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      11/15/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      11/24/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/18/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      10/13/2016 Arnhem, Netherlands Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. Scheduled Public Workshops UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Hazardous Locations Bundle      7/19/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations - Basics of Global Hazardous Locations Requirements      7/19/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations Intrinsic Safety Design Fundamentals      7/21/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations: Global Market Access - ATEX Directive IECEx, and Beyond      7/20/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061 – Overview and Introduction This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      11/16/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061 – Detailed requirements and practical exercises (case study-based) This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Electrical Standard for Industrial Machinery (NFPA 79, 2015 Edition)      6/1/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      6/28/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Introduction to the Basic Requirements of the National Electrical Code (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      6/2/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics and selection criteria for use in components and end products (Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical) in accordance with UL 94, UL 746 A - D      11/24/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Designing for Compliance to UL 60730: Automatic Electrical Controls for Household and Similar Use This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing for Compliance to UL 60730: Automatic Electrical Controls for Household and Similar Use Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      6/28/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      11/22/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      11/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/18/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/13/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Fire Forum Training There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Fire Doors, Frames, Seals and associated Hardware There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. PPE - Personal Protective Equipment There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Protection of Exterior Walls from Fire Spread There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Functional Safety Training      6/28/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      11/22/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      11/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/18/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/13/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Hazardous Locations Bundle      7/19/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations - Basics of Global Hazardous Locations Requirements      7/19/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations Intrinsic Safety Design Fundamentals      7/21/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Hazardous Locations: Global Market Access - ATEX Directive IECEx, and Beyond      7/20/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics - and the right selection in accordance with UL 94 & UL 746A-D      11/23/2016 Krefeld-Uerdingen, Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics and selection criteria for use in components and end products (Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical) in accordance with UL 94, UL 746 A - D      5/26/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/17/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/17/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics and selection criteria for use in components and end products (Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical) in accordance with UL 94, UL 746 A - D      11/24/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      6/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: Specifying and Evaluating Materials for Electrical, Electronic and Mechanical Applications      11/15/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      9/29/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      11/24/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site      9/27/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. Plastics: UL 94 Training Workshop - Understanding the proper techniques to conduct UL 94 testing at your site There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL 1446: Electrical Insulation Systems (Class A, E, B, F, H used in Motors, Transformers, Bobbins) for USA Market Access      6/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL 1446: Insulation Systems (Class A, E, B, F, H used in Motors, Transformers, Bobbins) for USA Market Access      9/27/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      10/13/2016 Arnhem, Netherlands Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      6/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Marking and Labeling Component Program      6/21/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings      6/1/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      12/6/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Industrial Control Panels UL 508A and Short-Circuit Current Ratings      11/30/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL’s Transition from UL 508C to UL 61800-5-1      7/5/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      12/1/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. A Review of UL/IEC61010-1 and Specific Safety Requirements for Programmable Logic Controllers: UL/IEC61010-2-201      10/11/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language A Review of UL/IEC61010-1 and Specific Safety Requirements for Programmable Logic Controllers: UL/IEC61010-2-201 There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061 – Overview and Introduction This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      11/16/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061      5/24/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Designing Safety-Related Machinery Control Systems in Accordance with ISO 13849 and IEC 62061 – Detailed requirements and practical exercises (case study-based) This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Electrical Standard for Industrial Machinery (NFPA 79, 2015 Edition)      10/26/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Electrical Standard for Industrial Machinery (NFPA 79, 2015 Edition)      6/1/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      6/28/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Functional Safety Training      11/22/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Globalability: The Key to International Compliance There are currently no dates scheduled for this course. You can let us know you're interested or learn more about our Private workshops. Private workshops are a great alternative when 5 or more individuals from your company can benefit from training on this topic. This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Introduction to the Basic Requirements of the National Electrical Code (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      10/27/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Introduction to the Basic Requirements of the National Electrical Code (NFPA 70®, 2014 Ed.)      6/2/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. Measurement, Control and Laboratory Use Equipment: Designing for Compliance to IEC 61010-1 3rd Edition      11/23/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/18/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. Product Liability for Manufacturers of Electric and Electronic Products sold on the United States’ Market      10/13/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. Specific Safety Requirements for AC Semiconductor Motor Controllers and Starters: UL 60947-4-2      6/28/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/30/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/18/2016 Reading, UK This seminar will be held in English language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe - Your Partner for North American Product Certification      10/19/2016 Milan, Italy Il seminario si terra in italiano. Il materiale didattico sara in inglese. This seminar will be held in Italian language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Twoj Partner w Certyfikacji Produktów na Rynek Ameryki Północnej      6/15/2016 Warsaw, Poland      10/19/2016 Warsaw, Poland Warsztaty będą prowadzone w jezyku polskim. Materiały szkoleniowe również będą przygotowane po polsku. This seminar will be held in Polish language. The course materials are in Polish language. UL Europe: Váš spolehlivý partner pro certifikaci produktů určených pro trh v Severní Americe Seminar je v ceskem jazyce. Vytistene materialy jsou prevazne v ceskem jazyce. This seminar will be held in Czech language. The course materials are in Czech language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/25/2016 Saint Aubin, France      11/16/2016 Lyon / Villeurbanne, France      11/16/2016 Saint Aubin, France Tous les séminaires seront présentés en Français, les supports de formation seront en Anglais. This seminar will be held in French language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification      5/31/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany      11/22/2016 Neu-Isenburg (Zeppelinheim), Germany Das Seminar wird in deutscher Sprache abgehalten. Die Schulungsunterlagen sind in englischer Sprache. This seminar will be held in German language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification Het seminar zal worden gehouden in het Nederlands. De cursus materialen zijn in het Engels. This seminar will be held in Dutch language. The course materials are in English language. UL Europe: Your Partner for North American Product Certification El seminario se realizará en castellano. El material del seminario solo estará disponible en inglés. This seminar will be held in Spanish language. The course materials are in English language. Scheduled Public Workshops Paneles de Control Industrial, Norma UL 508A y Medidas de Corriente en Cortocircuitos      6/29/2016 Mexico City, Mexico      10/11/2016 Monterrey, Mexico Éste taller de un día y medio proporciona información técnica a los profesionales de paneles de control industrial. El taller es ideal para aquellos que necesitan comprender los requisitos de cumplimiento de la seguridad de la norma UL 508A aplicables a paneles de control industrial, así como los requisitos que se encuentran en el Código Eléctrico Nacional (NEC) del artículo 409 y la norma UL 508A Suplemento B. Scheduled Public Workshops Paneles de Control Industrial, Norma UL 508A y Medidas de Corriente en Cortocircuitos      6/29/2016 Mexico City, Mexico      10/11/2016 Monterrey, Mexico Éste taller de un día y medio proporciona información técnica a los profesionales de paneles de control industrial. El taller es ideal para aquellos que necesitan comprender los requisitos de cumplimiento de la seguridad de la norma UL 508A aplicables a paneles de control industrial, así como los requisitos que se encuentran en el Código Eléctrico Nacional (NEC) del artículo 409 y la norma UL 508A Suplemento B. Click a topic below to see what courses are available : Search Again Didn't see what you're looking for here? Select another course topic selection from the list below :   All Courses Public Workshops Essentials Curricula rope Classes tin America Additive Manufacturing Appliances Austria Banking and Payment Technologies Battery Safety Building Materials and Suppression Code Authorities and Codes Code Officials Components Conformity Assessment Consumer Technologies Contractor Programs Critical Components Cybersecurity Czech Republic Data Acceptance Program Denmark Electrical Practices and Safety Electrical Safety Electrical Vehicles EMC Energy Europe: Appliances Europe: Building Materials Europe: Consumer Technologies Europe: Hazardous Locations Europe: Performance Materials Europe: Power and Controls Fire Safety France General UL Germany Global Directives Global Market Access GMA: Global Market Access Hazard Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) Hazardous Location Risks Hazardous Locations Health Sciences Insurers ISO Quality Management Italy Latin America: Power and Controls Lean Six Sigma Life Safety and Security Lighting Lightning Protection Mexico Netherlands Oil and Gas Performance Materials Poland Power and Controls Processes and Tools Regulatory, Trade and Government Affairs Safety Engineering Safety Standards Social Auditing and Responsible Sourcing Spain Supply Connections Sustainability Transaction Security UK UL Programs Wireless Requirements Additive Manufacturing Appliances Banking and Payment Technologies Battery Safety Building Materials and Suppression Code Officials Components Consumer Technologies Contractor Programs Cybersecurity Data Acceptance Program Electrical Practices and Safety Electrical Vehicles Energy Fire Safety General UL GMA: Global Market Access Hazardous Locations Health Sciences Insurers ISO Quality Management Lean Six Sigma Life Safety and Security Lighting Lightning Protection Oil and Gas Performance Materials Power and Controls Safety Engineering Code Authorities and Codes Conformity Assessment Critical Components Electrical Safety Global Directives Global Market Access Hazard Based Safety Engineering (HBSE) Hazardous Location Risks Processes and Tools Regulatory, Trade and Government Affairs Safety Standards Social Auditing and Responsible Sourcing Supply Connections Sustainability Transaction Security UL Programs Wireless Requirements Czech Republic Denmark Europe: Appliances Europe: Consumer Technologies Europe: Hazardous Locations Europe: Performance Materials Europe: Power and Controls France Germany Italy Netherlands Poland Spain UK Latin America: Power and Controls Mexico   UL and the UL logo are trademarks of UL LLC © 2016.
